We are gonna hand out gift shirts, toy water guns and bags! So fun.
Even so, I'm glad I listened to 'The BFG' on audio. Richardson narrated the book in a way that my mind alone could not have allowed me to experience, particularly in capturing the voice of the BFG.
In a small bowl, whisk together lemon juice, olive oil and salt and pepper. Drizzle dressing over salad and toss well to coat evenly.
So far, teeth have been regenerated in mice and monkeys, and clinical trials with humans are underway, but whether the technology can generate teeth that are nourished by the blood and have full sensations remains to be seen. Teeth present a unique challenge for researchers because the stem cells must be stimulated to grow the right balance of hard tissue, dentin and enamel, while producing the correct size and shape. I'm dubious about the time frame, but over half of the dentists in a 2009 nationwide survey thought stem cell-based dental technology would be available within the next decade.
Sorry I haven't been reading and commenting lately...It's just been busy around here and also I've been playing with my Photoshop program trying to learn it. You know you're hooked when you start playing around with it at 5pm then magically...it's 5 hours later???Hahaaa...Oh well, it's fun. We were also out of town this last weekend visiting friends in San Antonio and I didn't post or read blogs...Sorry! I'll fix That, today!
She’s @home/
And these two interesting and somewhat genitalia-conflicting interpretations serve to highlight the phrase, "It's all in your head."
Deputy Joan Burton: ￼ ￼ The Deputy introduced the terminology.
This time the moon rang out for over 3 hours!
Everyone in earshot had to scrape their jaws off the floor, because Dr. Bag might have just shown the first proof that he is not, in fact, a horrible human being with no soul or emotion. Red Hair. Magical unicorn happy sauce and possible cure for douchebagitis, I'm telling you.
If you’re coming to my house, bring an interesting bottle of flavored vinegar. I am an avid collector of vinegars and embarrassed to tell you how many I have on my shelf. One more will always make me happy. Raspberry would be a nice choice.
Where are you?
When you hear of wars and rumors of wars, do not be alarmed. Such things must happen, but the end is still to come.Mark 13:7
“Not me,” says the boxing writer …
The director came over and said, “We’ve never had anyone ask to move a grave marker closer. But I’m sure it’s okay, but we can’t move it right next to his.”
to be found in the dark
2011? Where has the time gone? It's about time I started blogging again - I have lots of new fresh recipes to share...stay tuned.
That first delicious hint drew me in, the suggestion that the partners in adultery followed through not because of the overwhelming rightness of their love but because once the child was involved, the overwhelming rightness of their love could be the only justifiable reason for destroying her parents’ marriage and her stability. We all tend to assume that other people are the grown ups; that everyone else behaves in an adult fashion. But of course that’s not true: secretly we are all still waiting to grow up. That’s why the last sentence of the quoted paragraph is so perfect and so full of ambiguous tension: they had been behaving as if they could get away with something, but once a child was involved they had to act like grown ups and start believing in consequences. Something they had wanted to do might now become something they didn’t want to do, but were compelled to do.
This time the step down was precipitated by a larger than usual oil spike and a marked decrease in shipping volume. The Greek and French elections are blackswan events while the falling stock market is a simple reaction that will cause other reactions, some of which I mentioned in last night's post.
So far, there has only been one humorous incident of a misplaced word (and of course I shall share it).
2 lbs fresh Cod fillets, cut into serving size portions
That isn't to say I'm going to be more close minded. I don't want that. It was just a reminder to believe in myself.
Overall I like them both for different purposes and plan on incorporating them into the yard this year.
deicde Labrique, Montreal, QC, Canada (06.10.1992)
Never-the-less, I’m still excited about The Shops at Target. Glutton for punishment I suppose. This will feature clothing from The Webster, home by Privet House, make-up from The Cos Bar, and then randomly candy and dog accessories from The Candy Store and Polka Dog Bakery respectively.
Take a cedar plank sheet that can be found at most groceries and place in cool water at least 15 minutes (planks are located in the grilling section of your grocery). Chop up some red onion, leek, dill and toss with a touch of olive oil and sugar. Mix above and set aside. Take a 6 oz filet of salmon and lay on cedar plank seasoning with salt and pepper. Top with mix above and wrap cedar plank around salmon with seem under to seal it or if desired place seem up and tie with twine. Place in 400 degree oven and bake 8 minutes then turn down the heat to 275 degrees for another 10-12 minutes until temp reaches 142 degrees. Meanwhile make your favorite squash or a salad alongside the salmon. The beauty of simplicity with great flavors…..
The attack on our constitution and our freedoms are led by the spokes hole Nancy Pelosi. This time she wants to change the First Amendment of The Constitution. Pelsoi and the rest of the elites, the Left, the evil Obama, and the Democrat Socialist Party want to restrict what can be said and can‘t be said by business’s that disagree with the policies of the Left and those in power.
97 days, though?
John Kostun is not a name I have heard before. Two adult John Kostuns appear in the 1930 census index on Ancestry.com. Both were born in Czechoslovakia - one in 1895 with a wife Mary and one in 1899 with a wife Anna. Both lived in the First Ward, worked at a shoe factory and were identified as Carpatho-Russian or Ruthenian. This man could be either of them, however the man born in 1895 has boarders in the household named Kost and Bundza. These are both names associated with the Pereksta family in Europe.
He will suffer for his lack of vision; he is yesterday’s man desperately trying to cling onto power for power’s sake.
We are being kept busy with DREAMS of lala-lands in dreamland, while our people are being murdered EVERY DAY and it is going to get WORSE, MUCH WORSE!
Cancun - for the beaches and the sun, not the partying. My favorite vacation is a book, and a beach.
3/4 cup butter or margarine
“Sound like you need quite a bit,” Tanner was gruff.
5 Beaumont, Kansas City, MO
Even two out of four would be a massive improvement, if we’re being honest.
I was fortunate and blessed to be able to make my living selling chemicals or equipments were I would say the truth without raising false hopes.
Howdy, peeps! I know, where have I BEEN!!?? Working, playing with my puppies, goofing off on Facebook (Farmville is addictive) and in general busting my hump all summer in order to get some yard projects finished. They are, since you are no doubt wondering, not done yet. None of them. But I have managed to get most of the soil dug up, gravel placed, pavers down, doghouse built, flowerbeds made from the dirt, rock wall installed to hold the flowerbed... Give me a B- for the quantity if not the quality. :)
I took quite a few images, was again ‘inspired’.
There has been some wild weather around lately. We were treated to an unheard of "White Christmas" down-under when a freak summer storm saw areas of outer Melbourne blanketed in massive hail stones. The noise on the tin roof at my Mother-in-laws was almost deafening and I'm sorry to say that my little car now resembles a dimply golf ball! I'm still waiting for confirmation though the insurance company warned me it may be a total loss.
having it regarded
Quantity of Sugar will be half the measurement of the weight of the Juice extracted. If the juice extracted is weighed to be 800gms, then the Sugar to be added will be 400gms.
The local extras were in a scene with Simon Pegg (”Shaun of the Dead,” “Hot Fuzz”) and Kirsten Dunst (”Spiderman I, II, III,” “Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind.”) More details about the film at DumboNYC.
Changes to skin tone and colour.
Superintendent Matthew Khaile was detained on May 14 after he allegedly tried to solicit a bribe from a resident, who reported him to the police.
missing, your body and
Christian churches, agricultural prosperity and a magnificent ancient necropolis, known as the City of the Dead attract tourists from all over Russia. The village of Dargavs, or as the locals call it, the City of the Dead, has a cemetery with almost 100 ancient stone crypts where people that lived in the valley buried their loved ones along with clothes and belongings.
For some reason, 2012 is shaping up to be the year of cloud-based Windows 7 and Microsoft Office offerings, including scarily bad services such as OnLive Desktop, which was a media darling in January based on nothing more than demos. The real product is all but unusable — you lose your connection when you switch to other apps, for example, and you can’t use the iPad’s native keyboard. Plus, the company violated Microsoft’s Windows 7 licensing terms, offering an essentially illegal desktop-as-a-service product. (That issue has since been resolved.)
2010 IN THE CHAVEZ FAMILY
Homeopathy
“Thank you,” said the woman as she closed her eyes, grateful to be off her swollen feet.
I heard them talking and things seemed to be going well, and I started to relax a bit; and I started trying to be more positive, and I might have went to greet them but I woke up.
BusinessWeek
As someone who has wanted to be a Mother for so long this behavior astounds me. I look at our babies as such an amazing blessing. I was lucky to be raised by an amazing Mother who shows me and now Bill such love and compassion everyday.
Apparently there is a statue to the uncle in Valparaiso... I've nevver been able to confirm the details, but it seems he was honoured as a hero, for warning the town of an impending attack by the Peruvian Navy...
After several minutes of back-and-forth with her vomit, she had to run to the bathroom, although it was more of a stumble. She made it to the toilet and let out a long wretch.
And why I’ll never know.
N: “Ohh… huh.”
But it was not complete.
16. For my sewing projects ... all that felt just waiting for my little hands to sew & stuff it! From BenzieBazaar
*Place butter in a large mixing bowl and blend until smooth. Add cream cheese and blend until well combined, about 30 seconds.
And last night, Beloved Husband read an excerpt of my novel and absolutely hated it.
For the convenience of browsing, here are all the related links on my 8-days tour to parts of China, namely Wuxi, Suzhou, Nanjing, Hangzhou, and Shanghai. Thank you for joining me on this visual recall of my trip.
Let me also wear
From the kitchen...nuthin'! Since moving, I haven't quite picked up the pace. I'd *like* to make some chocolate chip banana muffins, but won't guarantee I get to it today!
In Indian classical music, each swara (note) has a specific colour and when in combination with each other, various Ragas (tunes) are created(Samaveda has mentioned the 7 swaras, their respective colours, related god, grahas(planets) etc.). The corresponding colours of these swaras (or notes, the Indian equivalent of Do, Re, Mi…)are as follows: Sa- Green, Ri- Red, Ga- Golden, Ma- White/ Yellowish tint, Pa- Blue, Dha- Yellow, Ni- Multicoloured.
He must lead, not just some but all of us, as he has from the very beginning.
Tracey Hotpants: Thanks, Marky, but I don’t like being bitten.
After writing about the iconic lemonade stand as a model with which to teach children about entrepreneurship, one of my readers asked if paper routes counted too. I hadn’t given that any thought, so I went to my first research stop, my friend Mr. Google. It seems that lemonade stands, paper routes, and babysitting have been recognized as the big three of early work experiences for kids, as they learn about earning money of their own. Lemonade stands have become the iconic entrepreneurial standard because they involve children embarking on their own venture, with its attendant risks and rewards, as opposed to paper routes and babysitting, where the child is learning responsibility and the value of work and reward of money, but is working for someone else.
“In-Soo invited me,” she said trying to catch her breath as she ran with him toward his black sports car.
I studied Dorothy's picture. Her eyes were a luminous puzzle. Who was this mystery man? She'd captured his heart, that's certain. Did they end up together? Did they celebrate their 50th anniversary with their children and grandchildren surrounding them? Or did they end up marrying other people?
“The dedicated imprint for mainstream authors to get their out-of print titles back into print and onto bookshelves. We have created a range of options based on feedback from our friends in mainstream publishing. Our offer ranges from a simple back-into-print deal to a complete re-design and re-launch.”
* Natasha Angelety as Cirque Freak
2/3 cup instant vanilla pudding mix (Jello Brand works the best)
what do i want my life to look like? the page simply is. it always exists. what i want my life to look like is this journey of walking toward whatever it is that beats at its core, veined and bloody. it may or may not be real. this is not the issue. i sense the heart. i walk toward it. this is all that matters.
We strutted with him.
She encourages children at the schools she visits to tell their own myth or to imagine themselves to be like Achilles or Odysseus. “ They draw pictures of their heroes, write and illustrate their own stories and act them out, so it becomes very interactive and easier to relate to and to remember.”
Alabama - The Rebel WIfe
Enough of this feel good contextual (Hmm- Contextual Fitness?!?) snuggle party stuff! It’s “Best Caption” wins something Thursday…
The SUO challenge is to do a congratulations card in honor of Michelle Laycock, who is celebrating her 10th anniversary as a Stampin' Up! Demonstrator. I hope this will do.
Whether you’re beginning with Christ or close to the finish line, I trust you feel deeply the need for hope. May God grant each of us the grace of Christ and the power of the Holy Spirit to have trained minds and obedient lives!
-What type of classroom do you have? I have a self-contained (center-based) classroom of students who are SXI (severely multiply impaired, for those who do not have the same acronyms as Michigan does - they are all both cognitively and physically or otherwise impaired). They are MOCI (moderately cognitively impaired) and SCI (severely cognitively impaired) level cognitively.
Bartolomeus Anglicus, "Bartholomew of England", as translated by John of Trevisa was an early conspirator in the whole antipodean thing. Back in the thirteenth century, the luxury of google earth was not available to learned scholars, possibly because there was no electricity to run their laptops.
Pour another cup of tea and continue staring at blank screen.
W, X, Y, Z --It's fun to wander through the alphabet with you, to tell you what you mean to me.
His father, Tahir Hussain, is a film producer while his deceased uncle, Nasir Hussain, was a film producer as well as a director. He is an off-spring of the Muslim scholar and politician Maulana Abul Kalam Azad. He is also a descendant of former President of India Dr. Zakir Hussain and a second cousin to former Chairperson of Rajya Sabha Dr Najma Heptullah. During the years of Qayamat Se Qayamat Tak, Khan married Reena Dutta as a result of this marriage his parents did not approve because of her not being a Muslim and so Khan’s marriage stayed a secret both from his parents and the media for a while. Reena made a brief appearance in the popular song sequence Papa Kehte Hain in Qayamat Se Qayamat Tak. Reena Dutta maintained a low profile and continued her job at a travel agency. They had two children; a son named Junaid and a daughter, Ira, and led a quiet family life away from the public eye. Reena was involved, briefly, in Khan’s career when she worked as a producer for Lagaan. But a turning point came when in December 2002, Khan filed for divorce, ending the 15-year marriage, with Reena taking the custody of both their children. On December 28, 2005, he married Kiran Rao who had been an assistant director to Ashutosh Gowariker during the filming of Lagaan. In 2007, his brother Faisal caused a media scandal by accusing Khan of mistreating him and forcing him to take medication. Faisal has been said to be mentally unstable. In 2007, Khan was invited to have a wax imitation of him put on display at Madame Tussauds Museum in London.(Sampurn Media)
Details: what kind of coverage is she running? If her safety is up and she’s on her third margarita, she’s in zone. If the corners of her eyes follow your buttocks as you motion towards the restroom she’s in man. Either way you’re good, because as an aspiring World’s Greatest Lover you know how to mix a drink and tone that ass with lunges.
It works.
“Used To Be Sweet”
Sometimes life is just good, not for any special reason other than to be breathing and taking in every single moment we can.
I totally missed this one. Way back from 2007, but hat tip to Matthew Ridenhour with Charlotte Tea Party for posting on Facebook.
-Performances by: Watsonville Taiko, UCSC Aikido Club, & Shamisen by Kyle Abbott!
The Real Ono Band
History of Jade
3) Same with Mingle itself
He can snuggle back in the telephone pole.
Riddle Question: What building has the most stories?
Might get offered a bad contract. (Don’t be afraid to renegotiate!!! If there is a profit to be made most small publishers are amendable.)
Gingrich: Politics has become a very nasty
“I am he.” Zero said, a little bemused at this curious intrusion. Another man stood under the wash of light in the hallway, indistinguishable from where Zero sat.
He does not recommend supplements to the diet as the norm, rather that some animals may need them in certain circumstances, accordingly most raw meaty bones feeders do not provide supplements.
“Yes, hair is very annoying to me.”
An opening suspense sequence sets up the premise of director David A. Prior's film. A bunch of mercenaries—led by jacked-up sunglasses-wearing second-in-command Lt. Thornton (Fritz Matthews)—are hunting after some random chubby guy, looking to kill him. They eventually accomplish their mission, but not after the guy resourcefully knocks out one of the mercenaries; Thornton eventually kills this member, presumably for his failure to measure up to this covert army unit's high standards.
I arrived at IndyHumane on March 11th from my previous home at the Johnson County Animal Shelter. When I got here, the wonderful veterinary medical staff here said I had a condition in my right eye called “phthisis bulbi and the conjunctiva/third eyelid was adhered to the shrinking globe with no evidence of a globe.” Look, I have no idea what that means. I just know that my vision wasn’t great and I couldn’t see out of my right eye. According to my chart (that I totally sneak peeks at) this condition might have happened as the result of a “ruptured ulcer or other traumatic corneal defect or uveitis.” Again, no idea. I just got used to having one eye and making the best of it. My mouth wasn’t much better. I had some pretty bad dental problems and a lot of that tartar stuff on my teeth. I guess kissing me wasn’t a picnic.
I vote we move away from the kerfuffles and back toward the books in 2012.
Now here I am three and a half years later. I just got home from having dinner with my dear friend, Pam Sharp. A book came out this year by Kelle Hampton, a blogger/photographer/writer who had a child with Down Syndrome a couple years ago. Her book, "Bloom", shares her story of having her life turned around by the birth of her sweet girl, Nella. I borrowed the book from a friend and read it one day while on a weekend trip with Phillip a few weeks ago. My friend, Pam, also read the book recently, because her daughter , Sammi, started following Kelle's blog a couple years ago and bought a copy of the book when it came out.Pam called me a week ago after reading the book and said she wanted to go out with me and talk about the book. She wondered if she had been a good friend to me during the time when I had Zach. Did I receive the kind of support Kelle received? She had some questions she wanted to ask me and wanted us to discuss the book together.
In early 1983, their lone album, Battle Hymns For Children Singing, appeared, gathering up all three previous singles as well as the concurrently released "Sister Friction." A fun record worth picking up if you can find it, but be wary of the CD reissues: the version issued in 2000 by Razor and Tie features extra tracks, but was poorly mastered resulting in some songs being sped up while others are slowed noticeably; Cherry Pop's 2007 reissue doesn't have the mastering issues, but has different bonus tracks.
of the three dimensions,
42. The most infamous Scottish dish is haggis, normally made with the heart, liver, and lungs of a sheep, traditionally boiled in the animal’s stomach. It is not known where it originated, but a similar dish was mentioned in Greece 2,500 years ago.
Alyssa Ogawa, T'Pol, Lieutenant Britney, Jennifer Baxter, Jadzia Dax, Deanna Troi, Seven of Nine and myself are all in the Ready Room, holding a crisis meeting.
The above passage assures us, that the energy saving we have is our potential energy. It will eventually turn into a visible result.
There are, of course, many individuals who contributed to the long journey of women’s rights, but I have a soft spot for Wollstonecraft. She understood the importance of believing in something even when it seems so far out of reach. While an incredibly difficult thing to do, it is well within our grasp if we make the choice to believe.
2 equivalent
Last week while I was at the library I thought to stock up on some audio books to listen to on these drives. We're a family of bookworms, and we follow a more or less classical curriculum. The recommended reading lists for classical education are so long that even we would be hard pressed to actually read every book on them. I find long drives are a perfect time to check off some of them.
Look at your blog feed. Do you see any you haven't read since 10 posts ago? Why do you subscribe to them?
Because this meat is so lean, you won't have enough drippings to make gravy. It is delicious hot, warm, or at room temperature.
Three months ago, I wrote my last post. This is by far, the longest I've gone without blogging and my, how I've missed it! Let's get right down to business, where the hell have I been for the past three months??! Well, I'll tell ya!
Peter insisted on being in charge of the festivities, which I was completely happy to bag. I have a few other things going on, so, it was fine...
So, my brother loves zombie books, he recommends a few. Among them this one. I say, "Yeah, Yeah. Manana." Then my son says, "Oh yeah, I have that book, it was really good." How alarming. He has read it and enjoyed it. He left it with me, along with a couple of other books I didn't know we had in the house.
Her face wears a strangely startled and shocked look of someone not expecting or believing what is before them. Rather a Lilliput moment. She kneels beside me as I type still wearing that same expression. I try not to take it personally.
One of my neighbors put it best...we're in survival mode right now. Chris feeds me and Kodi, and I feed Kalia. We've managed to go on our nightly walks almost every night the past week, which even though it takes away from sleep time, is helping me keep my sanity around these parts.
It was warm, but not warm enough in chilly December air. We had fun running in a whirlpool area with other laughing bathers, standing over the bubbling jets, and averting our eyes from teenage couples on dates…but I needed warmer water! I needed to make that entire process of arriving here worth it!
"The world is over, what next" doesn't appeal to some readers; for others of us (me! me! me!) I love the idea of it. No, I don't want the world to end! But what happens when the world as you know it does? Who becomes the leaders? Is the soccer player the best person to run things? Or is it the quiet kid who played a lot of World of Warcraft? Do you create a fortress? Do you move constantly, always looking for someplace safe? When it all comes tumbling down, do you take care of yourself or others? The Enemy looks at all of this -- using kids and young teens.
Always be very particular while you choose your meditation place. It should be clean, quiet and calm. Best place for meditation is within nature, like garden or lawn.
What's obsessing you now?
Amazon has been removing the “buy button” from some of the Hachette Livre books and also removing some of their titles from promotional positions such as “Perfect Partner”, in order to apply pressure on them to give Amazon even better commercial terms than it presently receives.
As the book opens, it's summer. Henry and his court are staying at Wolf Hall, home of the Seymours, where Henry has his piggy eye on stiff, prudish little Jane, destined to be his next queen. Thomas Cromwell is flying his hawks, named after his dead daughters. "His children are falling from the sky," Mantel begins. "He watches from horseback, acres of England stretching behind him; they drop, gilt-winged, each with a blood-filled gaze … All summer has been like this, a riot of dismemberment." And we're off, into the deep, dark, labyrinthine, but strangely objective mind of Thomas Cromwell.
Israeli Ambassador Michael Oren not only called the head of CBS news in an attempt to quash a report on the displacement of Palestinian Christians by the Israeli Occupation of the West Bank and East Jerusalem, but he briefed Prime Minister Binyamin Netanyahu of the far right wing Likud Party on his attempt.
a similar gag in the Crump sketches. Here's a montage, with the color element taken out for easier comparison all around.
Who can be called by any name
I’ll refer again to my time teaching middle school. Every bully I encountered had a backstory, a reason for their anger and aggression. Human beings don’t torture or hate by accident—something has to fuel the bullying. I wanted Bull’s horrendous actions to have a source and a reason and not be read as “Oh he’s just the mean teenager. That’s why he bullies. He’s mean.” Human beings are far more complex that that, and Bull was very real to me. So was Victor and his heartbreaking pain. I sincerely hope the reader ends up loving those boys as much as I did while writing them.
So, I probably contacted her, chatted her up online until she could stand me no more, and here we are, ready to give away her third book! Allison also has an exciting fourth book coming out early 2012, called, The Song Remains the Same! Sneak Peek HERE!
Missiles on rooftops and heaths are not reassuring, they are ludicrous and give the impression that the government has not only lost the plot, but lost control. If we get to the stage where we are blowing things up ourselves in the name of safety, then God help us all.
It's an entirely different question
I will corner Bob for ANOTHER instruction on picture manipulation so you can revel in my photo brilliance next week. I WILL LEARN THIS, even if I have to turn this hard-drive-hearted computer to applesauce!
I also managed to get some motorcycle riding in a day or so ago. Pretty interesting stuff. Let me just say going down a dirt/rock road is pretty intense the road moves the entire time with the bike so sometimes the bike wants to go one way or the other so you’re in a pretty interesting balancing act. I did like it though.
Yeah, I was pleasantly surprised with this one – well worth the investment of some time and patience.
The Gift of Fire - In ancient mythology, the Titan Prometheus was punished by the gods for bringing man the gift of fire—an event that set humankind on its course of knowledge. As punishment for making man as powerful as gods, Prometheus was bound to a rock; every day his immortal body was devoured by a giant eagle. But in The Gift of Fire, those chains cease to be, and the great champion of man walks from that immortal prison into present-day South Central Los Angeles.
What do you think? Would you rather a fantasy begin in the ‘fantastic’ world, or would you rather have more time to get to know the characters in the real world first? I can't wait to see how everyone else reacted!
I am not angry anymore. I am only quiet.
Need for Dispatch ProStreetNeed For Dispatch ProStreet
You can probably tell how much I love finding new covers by now. ;) But don't they just make you really excited for summer? We still have to go through spring to get there, but that doesn't mean we can't dream about sun-soaking and beach-swimming and sight-seeing!
No-response-needed-texts – sometimes a guy will text you saying something which really requires no response. You could continue the conversation if you can be bothered – or simply write back with something like “haha” (implying that you don’t have the time or energy to be texting him right now). Or you could use it as a test and not write back. If you don’t write back, he may either:
It was not nails that held Jesus to the cross.
Chop some green onion and chilies and mix with regular soy sauce (preferably low sodium), rice vinegar, and a little water.
as entwined passion
captured some of life's beautifully quiet moments: the curious gaze of a neighborhood
And – until we perceive that it is our systems(rules) and Rulers that have done for us, we will remain in the boiling pot getting cooked.
Say an author has reached that happy place where multiple editors are interested in purchasing her debut novel. Would it be viewed as peculiar if the author wanted to interview each editor to find "the best fit" -- dollar signs aside? Not at all. This doesn't always happen, but it happens often enough. And the editors involved are usually really pleased when it does--it says you value our part in this process as well as the check we'll cut you.
Have I mentioned lately, that I love what I do? I love creating art, I love telling stories, I love encouraging the body of Christ to “use whatever gifts they have received to serve others.” It’s my life’s work and even thinking about it just excites me. I am a blessed man.
Lower right (Maia's): cantaloupe; blueberries; strawberries; kale & veggie sausage.
Date/Time: September 1 2009 at 0:18 UTC
So here is my version of a Valentine Friend ATC on “Fun ATC”S
We didn't have a 'closet', so we hang our clothes off a branch suspended from the ceiling by two pieces of rope.
through steel grates,
And I should have some birthday celebration pictures to post later this week. We've got just this week left before spring break begins at school. Unfortunately, I'm working for most of the week of spring break! :(
My sweet neighbor took my two older children while I headed off with the baby to the Walgreen's Clinic. I was in and out of there in no time. They took one look at my throat and new I had strep as well.
There is a Vatika Resort in Ranthambore, which is almost 5 kms away from the famous place Sawai Madhopur railway station. Here you will feel that this is a perfect place especially for the wild life lovers. The resort is located amidst the beautiful surroundings of greenery and beautiful gardens. This resort has 5 beautiful cottages and each of the cottages is associated with attached baths and the beautiful private garden. The tourists enjoy their stay in the rooms of this resort as they are decorated beautifully and equipped with modern amenities.
my parents have been great. really accommodating. my mom even said it was a good practice run for when i get my plastic surgery (in the far off future now, i guess).
It’s a capacitive touchscreen jobby too, which means you use gestures on the screen to navigate the PS Vita’s brand new interface, instead of using the D-Pad, and most games make heavy use of that touch input too.
I’m a ritual loving girl. I love getting up in the morning, exercising, eating my breakfast (steel cut oatmeal with fruit along with a cup of coffee).
And the first thing we bake are white loaves. Simple, but really nice.
COMMENTS - who doesn't love comments? Responding to them is a great idea. (I tried very hard to reply to all the comments I got during the challenge, I know there are still a few I missed, sorry, I'll try and get them done)
The cottage kitchen version of the make-over should run a DIYer around $1500, while the other version would run around $1000, with careful shopping. Not too shabby, when typical kitchen renovations cost in the tens of thousands!
Doom and destruction had been invited into their household.
Today I chopped some parsley to a french required level purely for presentation, chives – same, dill – same. Visual represented green triffles to bolster over boiled potatoes, carrots and sprouts. No flavour consideration.
Toal wrote that Dickey was confronted by two younger, intoxicated large men advancing toward him at the Cornell Arms apartment complex in downtown Columbia.
Divide batter between cake pans and level with offset or rubber spatula. Bake until deep golden brown, cakes pull away from sides of pans, and toothpick inserted into center of cakes comes out clean, about 30 minutes (rotate cakes after about 20 minutes). Do not turn off oven.
Of Daniel O'Donnell, and blogging of course.
Interactive Student Notebook by A Teacher's Treasure: "The ultimate alternative assessment & differentiating tool. Students will become creative, independent, reflective, thinkers, readers and writers. Students will be able to express their own ideas, process, and or apply the information and skills learned in this class. This notebook serves as a live journal, personalized textbook, and working portfolio. Engages learners of all learning modalities & multiple intelligences." (4-12)
Eyes clear and bright, deep lungs
Pretty lame right, yep, I know.
“I could use a good cleansing brush,” she joked as she rubbed her face against Olivia’s soaped up mound.
Hear me roar
Coconut milk- 1/2 cup (optional)
a couple of blocks away with a Free 7 day pass.
Embrace the end you were made for and see how wide, how wonderful, and how surprising His End for you and everyone else really is.
Actually, according to Peter Davis, he said it 3 times.
Home Run Leader: Billy Williams 33
But the Clinton government undermined their efforts by requiring the farm claims to use a specific form designed by the government. This form imposed an administrative fee of $300 for each claim, which was later used in 1994 as a basis to arrest the leaders of the legal team including Roy Schwasinger.
In short, these films are not really such polar opposites of the Swedish film industry’s classic Ingmar Bergman template as you might think at first, and this is also their key deviation from the template of lefty Scandinavian social-realist crime fiction, even if Larsson and the filmmakers never quite realised it. More ties to the classical Swedish tradition for intense portraits of the human experiential crucible are sustained by the presence of the great Per Oscarsson, in his last role before his untimely death, star of the canonical 1966 adaptation of Knut Hamsun’s Hunger, as Lisbeth’s former state guardian, a compassionate man who’s been left part-paralysed by a stroke and completely excised from official interest in Lisbeth (as opposed to the attentive Blomkvist). His presence, and the way it is utilised, elucidates an interesting idea, that the welfare state is only good for your welfare when guided by principles and people of decency, and it can be turned into another apparatus of controlled social narcotisation. …Played With Fire trots in far fewer cornball bestseller cues than its predecessor, although plenty still slip by, with a new minor hero who’s a mixed martial arts enthusiast, an arch-villain who’s a former KGB agent, and a hulking offsider who’s one of the most striking monstrous goons since Jaws in the ‘70s Bond movies. The series’ basic conceit, of trying to conflate state and corporate paternalist behaviour with a more intimate, personally violent version of the same thing, is both calculatedly paranoid and more than a little reductive, and yet it’s also coherently conceived and executed, at least insofar as Larsson’s tales offer up characters who constantly, conveniently illustrate the matters at hand: abusive officials of state, medicine, and law enforcement whose conspiracies hamper justice and victimise society’s
I make a list of all the narrative drives to the story. I look at the drives for the external plot, the internal plot, and the subplots. At this stage, I write down as many necessary points to take each plot from beginning to end as I can think of. For a paranormal romance, these narratives drives could include: “Heroine discovers what she really is,” “The hero overcomes grief/guilt to find the freedom to reject science,” “Defeating the demon.”
As you resolove what to do this year, consider resolving who to be!
So I'm back with another new card, for my friend Sheri. Remember that Garage Sale I mentioned, yesterday? She is the one that invited me to join in on the Garage Sale with everyone. She is a wonderful wife and great friend, she has 3 cute, energetic children that she is homeschooling. I think she needs a nice thank you card that looks pretty, to lift her spirits :)
that she has in travelling by herself: throughout time,
Dear Eliot,
Even though divorced, I still love that marriage isn’t going out of fashion. I hope they will continue to be happy together for many years.
*FREE DOWNLOAD: (extracted from a Radio show in South America, initially this demo mix was produced ‘just for fun’ by Slim K on his laptop during a night flight to Chicago in Nov. 2010!) | **Get it FREE http://soundcloud.com/slimk/slim-k-open-up-your-heart-shadow-mix/download
O O O O that Shakespeherian Rag -
I do not deserve to live this way, in fear
3. Hazur
Petronius, however, has created in Encolpius a notoriously unreliable narrator. He leaves hints and clues in his text to warn us that we shouldn’t believe everything Encolpius tells us, and unravelling these clues has been a firm mainstay of Petronian scholarship. My article takes this well-accepted way of thinking about the Satyricon and turns it towards characters who have so far escaped critical attention. What comes out of this approach is some insight into the tensions in the lives of freedwomen and their partners, as well as a richer picture of a character who has previously been seen only as window-dressing.
No snow, and little
Building work is nearly finished on the creation of nine new plots at Redbridge Hollow.
Formed in 1992
“Data on life goals showed a shift away from those related to intrinsic values — such as developing a meaningful philosophy of life — and toward more extrinsic ones, such as being well-off financially — over the three generations.”
I’m always excited to use Joy’s stamps! This week, I created an adorable Valentine’s card using the Simply Charmed Cricut Cartridge and the Mother and daughter stamp set. I really love this cartridge; it is so cute and fun! I like to try to keep my projects simple so I can whip up cards fast if I need to.
“Three causeless blows.”
For those unfamiliar with what I am getting at, let me give you some insight into Green Day history. Green Day was following up their album Warning with an album called Cigarettes and Valentines in 2003. Near the end of their sessions, the master recordings for the twentysomething tracks were stolen and the band was left with two options: rerecord everything or start from scratch. Green Day chose the latter and history was made. The band recorded the rock opera American Idiot and created one of the most iconic albums thus far in the 21st Century. Even my Baby Boomer parents know who Green Day is because of American Idiot. I heard “Cigarettes and Valentines” for the very first time because of this live album and it’s exactly what I want in a Green Day song.
Players decide if they want to be dragonflies, bees, or people. Each group has a base, and everyone’s safe if they are touching the base. Everyone knows everyone’s chosen role. People run after the dragonflies, but must run away from bees. The dragonflies must run away from the people, but can defeat the bees. The bees can sting the people, but must run away from the dragonflies. The group that captures all its enemies will win the game.
all shot on my iPhone.
3) Bring a very comfortable pair of walking shoes, preferably not white.
I want to make it clear though that being a respectful parent doesn't mean agreeing with or approving of everything your teen does: it just means accepting and not attempting to control what they do. Thus a parent that's strongly anti-drugs of all types might share all their opinions on the issue with their teens, give them information on why they believe what they do, etc. Yet despite that, they wouldn't ground, punish, or shame their teen if they came home high. In a mutually respectful relationship, teens are far more likely to genuinely take their parents opinions into account when deciding what they want to do, but teens are still their own complete and autonomous people, and will make the choices they deem best for themselves in the end.
Heavy metal thunder as JZ storms through
Normally, my capacity is exceeded gradually, through the accumulation of simple, daily tasks.
The gay "marriage" lobby would like us to think so. Supporters of same-sex "marriage" envision a world where the logical question, when your friend tells you she's getting married, is "To a man or a woman, this time?" Their push to eradicate heteronormativity has created a battleground out of Massachusetts classrooms, where a lesbian teacher can insist to her eighth-grade class that she and her partner can have "intercourse" (provided that your definition of that word is twisted enough to include the use of various objects in the act). To those who dwell in this world, cake toppers for weddings should not just include "plastic heterosexual couples," or a bride and a groom respectively, but a bride kissing a bride, a groom embracing a groom, and perhaps, if the polyamorists get their way, numerous plastic figures of both genders engaged in plastic group sex, too.
To lead it from the pit, unjust,
“Gotcha.” (Followed by giggles from both of us)
How to Prove “Exceptional Ability” for the Sciences and Arts?
I really want this weekend to be different. Weekends are usually really rough having the kids so much and struggling to find stuff that I can handle to do with them. I have a sitter Saturday night and am going to connect with a friend for dinner at LEAST. Then if I feel like I can’t go out, I’m not gonna beat myself up or let what people say get to me. If I need to come home and relax around the house, then I will. I will let my comfort zone be alright and not let myself feel ashamed about what I need to do to be sane. I’m sick of making excuses and feeling like I have to explain myself. I don’t. I know the less I let other makes me feel bad and beat up myself, the more confident I will get over time.
Sometimes, all I can manage is to get to work, feed myself, make sure I have clean clothes. And even sometimes one or two of these go amiss. And I don't even have children. I have no clue how parents manage to fit everything in.
This morning the radio reported school buses canceled all over the region, highways closed here and there. From our window, the lake looked white. Not because it was frozen again but because the snowfall painted the air white.
victory in the Name of Jesus Christ!
Thus says The Lord: Murder of the innocent leads to the death of the guilty, who carry the innocent within them; take no part in their suicide. For all who do wear equally the guilt of the mother, all seek the penalty of death; from the lawmakers to the voters, to the building owner, to the workers, to the suppliers, to the mother, and finally to the father, if he does not take a stand to protect the helpless and the innocent who are without blame… Behold, they have brought the wrath of God upon their nation, upon their state, and upon all their cities! Calamity upon calamity, until I have laid them waste!
Me: "The government?"
Row 28: Cast off 2 stitches, knit to the end of the row. (18 stitches)
Great Divide Nomad Pilsner
shake
Ashley Walters
So I encourage you, if you should happen to see, for example, a wooden puzzle with “Ages 2+” on the box, but you know that your little one would love to try it out at 18 months, go ahead and give it to your child. If your little one wants to hold your calculator, allow them some time with it. If your baby is just begging to get her hands on her older sibling’s bouncy ball, give it a go. (Just be sure they are supervised, that’s all.)
Hmm Hmm…Don’t mind us as we puff out our masculine chest and spew machismo all about. Oh, sorry didn’t mean to get sweat all over your precious new Athleta Yoga top. Feel free to slide off your comfy Sanuks before you settle in this morning on the couch. We just poured a nice cup of Mr. Grey and chances are the kettle is still warm as evidence of the stream still gently rising into the air. If for some chance you thought things could not get any worse around here after yesterday’s Nickelback, Facts vs. Ignorance and dog balls post? Think again dear peep, its Thursday!!! Speaking of which we have never invited you into our pristine kitchen arena here at CultFit HQ? How rude…
They are all fantastic results to achieve in ten days time. Well, except for the last one, but I can get that up through exercise. And I will. The pain is not an excuse. Anyone with nerve pain or disc pain will tell you. It is very, very real. And scary. When your arms and legs and hands and feet go numb or start tingling and burning and then stab you...you get freaked.
We threw her a baby party just a few weeks ago, and we did it in modern vintage style. The invitations were inspired by this great vintage photo:
When asked how Santam’s agency, King James, reacted to Nando’s response, they say “no one ever spoofs the spoofer, so we did.” Nando’s has chosen to remain elusive by answering the ‘what next’ question as to whether there will be rebuttal with maybe, maybe not.
BM: I suppose it was at the University of Michigan; it was not before that. I hadn’t done anything like that in high school, but at Ann Arbor, a friend of mine from Dublin got me involved with their Civic Theater and we did a play called Hogan’s Goat, and I got hooked on it after that. It wasn’t too long before I went out to New York and went to the Irish Arts Center. I had read about it in the New Yorker Magazine and it was the Irish Rebel Theater at the IAC, so I was expecting something like Lincoln Center and of course it wasn’t. It was something like a little 80 seat theater over in Hell’s Kitchen. But that was good—they put me up because they needed a Gaelic teacher and I was able to do that. I was in a play within three or four days and later on I was the artistic director. Then it was like one thing after another. It was great, I was all connected up immediately.
Here's the front of my tag:
Miller RK, Bellinger D. Metals. Paul M (Ed.). Occupational and Environmental Reproductive Hazards: A Guide for Clinicians. Philadelphia, PA: Williams and Wilkins, 1993.
I decided instead to get dressed and head over to the Hilton for one of the many breakfast programs.
Catherine Silverton the “defence” barrister for Shahzada, (Again paid for by our tax money) was more honest in her summing up, it appears she did not even try to mitigate this horrific crime, she said: “Nothing I say on the defendant’s behalf is intended to suggest that these offences were anything other than the stuff of nightmares.”
5.) Will Ordy refuse to do cutesy things? Ha... this is one I always worry about. Because, he'll kiss me on the forehead all the time, but ask him to reenact it for the camera and he says, "no way!"
Heal-Lightning Build
General John Michael Loh, USAF (Ret.)
4) Walk away if a lawyer doesn’t have a license.
Place 1 layer, crumb side up, on serving plate. Spread with 1 cup Creamy Key Lime Filling to within 1/4 inch of edge. Add second layer, crumb side up; frost side and top of cake with remaining filling. Store loosely covered in refrigerator.
"Fat man!" she retorts as they collect and pick up the discarded clothes from the floor.
when I was wild with love
Above my head, dark and shower ridden flecks of rain, pointed like daggers and in the form of indecisive thoughts, crash onto my head. They penetrate my bathroom ceiling like damp paper and puncture my soul. They follow me like a wagging tail and smack me like a naughty schoolboy when I’ve being so bold as to not have done me homework.
“Mom you ROCK!”
For now I will take this sunny warm weather and work indoors. Soon enough the garden will beckon me and any cleaning indoors will be simple; with a broom and mop. I have until the snow melts off the garden. Better get crackin'.
The crowd roared, "Yes!"
The Ridenhour Courage Prize – Rep. John Lewis
This is where the resilience of human society is really showing up. Yes, the future is coming as shock to all of us, but at the same time, human beings have started to adapt to these changes very fast. Maybe, this is also going to be a survival of the fittest once again.
‘Truly.’ I completed his sentence, though that wasn’t the correct thing to say. But whatever. It was perfect.
So down to the “Nitty Gritty”;
Para hacer la vinagreta: Picar la cebolla bien chiquita y ponerla en un recipiente con tapa (a rosca mejor). Agregar el aceite, el limon y la menta finamente picada. Batir vigorosamente y reservar.
Several scientific conclusions and claims were expressed in the NYT Op-Ed piece by J. Hansenwith which I raised concerns and objections on a scientific basis. While allowing for imprecision in how nuanced climate change science is sometimes communicated in such venues, there were nonetheless statements in the Hansen NYT piece that drew my attention because they stood contrary to peer-reviewed literature. Some of these claims could also be tested and/or falsified by simple tests using data available in the public domain, with examples given below.
Your presence transforms the heart into paradise
These are my FAKE Mini System tests:
determines your character, competence and future. That critical choice must be made
Not so with the place we went this weekend. The chickens were pecked (but to be fair even some of our chickens are showing some pecking – I blame it on this never ending winter) and quite a few of them had raw exposed and bloody skin. There is really no time in chicken’s life that her butt should be bleeding.
by John Kane-Berman
Other times you make me sad because you are awesome and so broken. I want to nurture and mommy you.
Soon afterwards he took us to some rock formations which he – after leading tours through the cave for years and years - had learned to “play”. Tapping gently on different parts of the stalectities, he was able to create a rippling melody that left everyone amazed and delighted.
BUT once you get near Salt Lake City it's lush and very pretty. We pulled off the road to poke around a little stream. My brother has this need to splash around in every body of water we pass or something. The water wasn't very inviting so we stayed dry and the kids found old railroad spikes which are displayed with some rocks in my livingroom (I'm all about the high price souvenirs, don't you know).
Just the way nature intended them!
We can’t talk about this without cutting through a number of well-worn forum tropes, none of which we find informative on any point: “casual vs. hardcore,” “risk vs. reward,” “people want to see all the content,” “raiding is easy” (that one could merit an equal-length post all on its own), and all the others you’ve seen. Let’s simply look at how WoW gives any individual player their perception of progress as they continue to play the game. The players’ perceived progress is the beating heart of the MMO experience. No matter what walk of WoW life you’re in, you log in hoping to add something to your character sheet before you log out again, something tangible when you log in the next time. Though the reward mechanisms vary between low-level and max-level WoW, they all exhibit the same pattern: rewards have become increasingly detached from the player’s ability to overcome challenges.
Yet small business “sub-s corporations” (most domestic small businesses that have between 1-200 employees) are taxed at the wage earner rate and would be devastated by a 50% rate. Small businesses do most of the hiring in this country. Would someone care to explain how Democrats can claim to be for workers while being against their employers?
So, white boys and girls of South Africa. I apologise for sullying your mood. It would however be remiss, perhaps even criminal of me, to deceive you, or offer false hope. When do we reach the nexus in time that distinguishes an emigrant from a refugee? For your own sake, you need to leave. Ideally to the US, Europe, Oz or NZ, but if you cannot, Namibia or Botswana are not bad second choices. But leave, you MUST. If you’re still in doubt, try again to connect the dots spelled out here.
Change a life. Share a Christian novel.
CAUT Intellectual Property Advisory: The purpose of this advisory is to assist academic staff in retaining copyright ownership in the articles they publish in journals.
yes and it was amazing how muscular its small slender body was!
Quoth Sir Ralph, “It will be lighter soon,
1265 **D-II/21/1997. “Ancients and Moderns: On Constantine Cavafy’s Thermopylae.” Hellenic Cultural Organization, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(4), above, pp. 763-74.) See Item C-1999(3), above, pp. 7-8.
More snowy garden photos:
The script that prompted this perfect question
“We will enhance our promotion and marketing campaigns through our global brand “Malaysia Truly Asia” celebrating diversity to energize the tourism industry and provide the enabling framework to attract and increase tourist arrivals.”
Arguing that Republican leaders were acting outside of the interests of their constituents, Mr. Obama called on voters to “make your voice heard.”
Do you love this world?
Which reminds me, I need to pay for my membership soon.
REPRESENTATIVES OF THE GUILD and management met again April 11. We discussed the latest developments regarding Thunderdome and the previously discussed/proposed regional design centers.
Last night Emma's school hosted a family movie night in the auditorium. From the moment I picked Emma up from school until we left for the house Emma asked if we could go. Of course she didn't mention that it was last night until about 15 minutes before we needed to be there. I figured since Dave was stuck at work why not. So we rushed around to get our shoes and coats on and out the door we went.
Once upon a time, not so long ago, I was a fierce defender of sex positive feminism.
1/3 c COARSELY*** chopped walnuts, (not finely chopped - see pict. below!!)
It is like you are taking a tour through the pages of her mother's cooking diary. Mabel's mother is Dona Cano (Mrs. Cano), a popular lady who became an Ambassador of Santo Amaro da Purificacao, in the Brazilian state of Bahia, a small town that is located in the area known as "Reconcavo Bahiano", one the strongest cultural epicenter of the Brazilian culture. Dona Cano is a local celebrity due to her generosity, kindness and matriarcal figure, almost like a mother of all people from "Reconcavo".
Lots of tats came in again from readers, you folks are all the best!
4 ounces finely chopped chocolate or semi-sweet chocolate chips
- Vintage Edition Decorative Bottle Caps
If your interested here's were you can pick up your copy...
Nov 16 – NFCorp executive director Wan Shahinur Wan Salleh said they had used nearly RM600,000 of its funds to pay for credit card expenses, but pointed out that they were corporate cards used for “business development purposes”
A curious thing has happened since adopting this new “handle:” I am feeling more and more like this is who I am. Funny who we think we are and how life tells us otherwise as we “grow along.”
Trips like this always make me question my sanity, and I hope that some of you are in the same boat.
Beloved Ones,
Phill Collins In the air tonight UK
Denying The Cross
Missing resources leads to frustration
This was supposed to be our family adventure. I worked double shifts for 20 years in a dangerous, stressful, crappy job so we could retire early and have those kind of adventures as a family. When we decided to come to Scotland, we planned to spend weekends and holidays exploring our new home as a family.
Also, I just really like complicated things.
224Far other raptures, of unholy joy:
“We have set up a task team to investigate if there had been negligence on the part of the investigating officer, and if there is any, the provincial commissioner, Simon Mpempe, would determine the action to be taken,” said Mulaudzi.
The building offers concierge services Monday through Friday during regular business hours to help with packages, deliveries and other needs of the residents and their guests.
Math has been a lot of fun. In September we worked on measurement. We measured our own heights, tired to figure out how tall a giant was and compared the two. It was an opportunity to see who could problem solve and persevere. The students have worked with Cuisenaire rods. They've been building relationships and comparing the rods to get to know them. They are a manipulative used frequently to understand number, measurement, and other mathematical relationships.
I didn't even get the chance to hold my twins together, to get a picture of my twins together...the nurses then asked if I wanted pictures of my twins together...yes...God yes...but not like this. I wanted to be holding both babies, pink and fat, bundled up with little hats on their heads...crying and wanting to eat. I wanted pictures of them together playing, sleeping, the first day of school together...all the firsts...together. Not like this. It wasn't fair. My cheeks were red, from so much tears and wiping...I just wanted this day to have not happened...but it did. I miss you Nick with all my heart and soul. When you died, a part of me went with you. I wanted you to be part of our big, crazy family. You made me realize that life is a very special gift. I just wish that we had more time to spend together...but isn't that always the case. I at least got to tell you that I loved you very very much and I know you put up a fight to live...but now you are watching over your twin and helping him get through each day. Its hard, its very, very hard. A parent should never have to bury a child.
How do you rate on this type of thing? Do you consider yourself a welcoming host?
Connie helps out in the concession stand each Saturday, while Austin and I both coach a team. The girls (funny how they have now inherited the moniker 'the girls') cheer in their little Upward outfits. So things in the Green home are really, really busy right now. So forgive the infrequent updates, but here's what's going on these days with Austin, Lily Grace, and Lia Faith.
The payments in technology agreements usually take the form of a lumpsum, a royalty or a combination of both. The valuation and methods of payments in technology agreements are discussed at length in module 16 on valuation and methods of payment.
In the hard single bed, Kathleen’s feet sweat as she heard Claire stomping down the stairs to deliver her some Indian dish that she picked up every Wednesday from a trendy grocery store on her way home from work. It was too spicy for Kathleen’s palate and the meat was the same indistinguishable goop as the vegetables, but she ate it every week and pretended to be appreciative. She took a few bites to appease Claire, who was tittering about what she had for lunch that day at work. Claire looked all around the room, focusing her eyes on the bed skirt, the crooked throw rug, the smashed bug high in the left corner that no one had the heart to wipe away. Kathleen could tell that Claire had things that she wanted to say but couldn’t bring herself to. Every few days she’d bring up the cancer in felted tones but Kathleen would always stop the conversation before it got too far, before it made her scared.
Ironically, in addition to breaking his promise not to sign the law, Obama broke his promise on signing statements and attached a statement that he really does not want to detain citizens indefinitely (see the text of the statement here).
Today is the first day I'm back to my home, back to Aiji. ♥ I missed her so much in only one week! ;A;
We still needed to tackle uphill, which was more difficult because that is the direction of home.
drop baby off at mimi's, after lot's of kisses
navigates my life in God’s Will for me. I love God’s Word and I yearn to
Yes, Noodle Oodle is a real place.
TOP TEN COUNTDOWN – MUSIC BLOGFEST!
The glass doesn't cheat the consumer: it's never been officially a 'pint glass,' we just call it that because we want to be like the English -- God help us -- and they have true pint glasses, with a fill line, because they actually care about what they're getting in a glass. If the bar advertises a "pint" and serves your beer in a shaker glass...well, you can either bitch about it, or you can realize that you saw the damned glasses before you ordered, and should have bitched then. (I bitched about the incredibly thick-walled/based and tapered shaker I got that you see to the right...and got nowhere. I didn't buy another, though, and haven't been back since, despite very good food.)
And last week, Justice Minister Bob Nicholson seemed to be promoting vigilante justice when he said in some cases it was reasonable to fire warning shots at trespassers.
You say you want a revolution
Across grassland pimply with hundreds of ant hills, into the cover of imposing oak trees at Ham Cross Plantation. A mandarin duck perches on a branch above our heads – unlike many other duck species, mandarins like to nest in cavities in trees. Movement in the bracken ahead: a group of red deer are feeding. Once they become aware of our presence, heads are raised, ears pricked, eyes studying us intently. Although not a time of year when the deer can be at their most aggressive – the autumn rut, and when calves are born in early summer are when the deer could attack those who venture too close – we nonetheless keep a respectful distance, and they soon return to feeding, more bothered by their itchy moulting coats than by our proximity. We allow these majestic creatures to head on their way before continuing into more open parkland, past more veteran oaks, and what appears to be an extensive badger sett.
The past day, I’ve noticed more visitors looking at my book on Smashwords, Pazuzu – Manifestation. I believe the extra attention has been generated by my efforts promoting my two short story compilations – Horrid Tales of Wister Town and A Codex of Malevolence – but that the Pazuzu – Manifestation ebook is free is probably more applicable. Yet the small surge lured me back toward the Art people may find if they looked for my version of Pazuzu – go ahead, Search Matthew+Sawyer+Pazuzu on Google Images.
My flight to Monterey was scheduled for 8:15 yesterday morning. The night before, the weathermen were predicting storms of apocalyptic proportions. I was so looking forward to this trip. I knew that this trip was going to be really beneficial to my writing career. After spending a week with a stomach virus running rampant through my family, I needed this trip. When the newscasters said that flights out of O'Hare would likely be cancelled, I started shaking and twitching. "You don't understand! I HAVE to go!"
Is your beef aged? Wet or dry?
When people think of me, I hope they’ll also think of all my friends who have been through this and who are going through this now. But what I really hope for is that when people think about me, they will not waste time sitting there feeling sorry for me, rather I hope they will STAND UP in honor of me and all of my friends (past, present, and future). And they can do so by spreading awareness and helping to fund a cure for my friends.
Are you a sales shopper? It is that time of year in Europe and the sales signs are everywhere. The shops are full with rack upon rack of designer deductions and the shoe departments have upended every last toe-peeper, wedge, heel and flat onto the floor...crowds and chaos clutter the once calm and elegant department stores and boutiques.
Michael Gross ... Harry
Not feeling like a very good mother today.
Joseph G. Hunter, 31, South Hempstead, N.Y.
I am so excited to kick start the BootyBuns Cloth Diaper Giveaway with interviews conducted with awesome Cloth Diapering Momma’s. Today I am sharing my interview with Julie of My Cloth Diaper Stash. As a semi-stay-at-home Momma to Little JT, she started her blog to keep track of all the giveaways she was entering to ‘win
'Beautiful Spring' set in Latte & French Roast ink by A Muse Studio.
B. He's a boy and therefore cannot find anything unless it jumps out and bites him on the butt.
Totally Wired
and finally did get married.
It's sad, I know. But it's life.
There must have been more then 100 dollars in there
I’ve listened to many interviews with these guys and they really seem intelligent and thoughtful. This comes out clearly in the Podcast. They Might Be Giants Friday Night Family Podcast is an animated Podcast which covers topics ranging from colors to counting. But my favorite aspect of this show by far is the skeptical angle they take. It’s not overbearing but they’re not afraid to introduce scientific facts to children. This is most aptly illustrated in the episode, “science is real”. The show is typically John and John discussing a subject, then singing a song about it. It’s approached in a very clever manner that would easily be entertaining and educational for both children and adults… but mostly children.
In this instance, his great-great-great-grandfather, Falmouth Kearney left this village of 300 or so to seek a better life in America in the mid-1800s.
The hCG hormone kicks up the metabolism, by signaling the body to burn more fat. Following the hCG diet protocol your metabolism with operate over 30%–a much more efficient level to burn, rather than store. In other diets the metabolism has not changed, and following the diet will continue to run at the same rate, which in most of us dieters has been found to be at only 8%.
That, or anyone would hit the bottle during a painful divorce or “conversationalist” zombie siege, and it has nothing to do with her comment before. Is Honey the lost cat, and the dj’s broadcast about her, at the epicentre of the outbreak, or is it just a coincidence that the animal’s name is in the “love” circle of seemingly infected words? It appears to line up, strung together by adequate coincidences, to produce meaning, but are you convinced? What’s your criteria for being convinced; do you even know? Meanwhile, doom is close…so they tell you.
why is he so slow?
A place where friends stop by just because they were near.
Here’s another one. In the book I mention “a joke about farts” but never say what the joke was. Well, this is the joke:
The pace picked up, the world was a blur,
I have been cast out
Many years ago, I was a sponsor of the Riverdale Ropers jump rope team. This meant two one week sessions of Jump Rope Camp in Huntsville, Texas. Each year, the camp chose a motivational theme. I attended "Christmas in July" and "Super Heroes."
Paul, whose love of Alison transcended past and future, transforming his current life and helping Alison to overcome a dangerous disease.
Anyone out there think I can lose 20 pounds in 40 days? Because right now, my obsession with numbers says that is the goal. Oh and advice on how to do it is always welcome. And yes, I know the basic truth about weight loss: eat less; weigh less.
The hubs is pretty sick. For the past three days, my life has been consumed with taking care of him... taking him to doctor's appointments, figuring out his medical insurance (which changed over on Tuesday from an old policy to a new one), visiting the grocery store and pharmacy several billion times (no, not really), visiting the hospital at o-dark-thirty-ungodly-hour-in-the-morning (yes, really).
HEALING CAN BRING ABOUT SOME AMAZING THINGS…………………
In the second clip from an edition of the Today Show, aired immediately after the North Carolina Attorney General declared the accused Lacrosse players were innocent of all charges, and in which the usually highly selective Jon Stewart goes some way towards redeeming himself with a brilliant expose of Nancy Grace's behaviour. The clip is highly recommended, not only for Stewart's humour, but because it shows various further examples of Grace's guilt assuming and quite outrageous behaviour.
But that map does not really tell the tale, and there are plenty of direct connections between CS-ZGD and Venal, especially with the jump bridge system. My view of the world is slightly skewed by having started off in the south end of Deklein in that little purple spot of TNT territory and having fought through Branch and Tenal by going the long way around through CFC territory. We started next to Venal and a long way from Branch going that route. The DOTLAN map of Branch shows the connections better.
I do think this presents a most unique perspective of these very common sculptures, to say the least.
What is your word of the year? Anyone have any big changes coming up that require a little trusting to get you through?
Today I had a relatively important casting for the BBC, relatively important because anything for the BBC is important and because it was a casting director I'd not had the pleasure of meeting yet. I have had equally or more important castings this year. I prepared, as always, meticulously and tubed it to White City, Westbound, changing at Oxford Circus.
My grandma never made homemade lemonade. My mother-in-law does.
Eric Bogosian (Talk Radio)
I’m not troubled by President Obama’s slow jam with Jimmy Fallon, who dubbed the commander in chief “preezy” during Obama’s appearance on late-night TV. No, preezy is making me queasy because his nonstop campaigning is looking, well, sleazy — and his ad suggesting that Mitt Romney wouldn’t have killed Osama bin Laden is just the beginning of it.
*** SPOILERS AHEAD ***
Please do help …
–The American obesity epidemic would disappear overnight, as people who once weighed thousands of pounds are able to log in at a trim 185 pounds
Jadakiss - 36
b) it involves sprinkles
Emily, who is 10, asked her little brother Joshua if he knew what it meant when they said, “the sun never sets on the British Empire?” Josh wisely nodded his head, but Em proceeded to tell him anyway. He is quickly learning how to tune her out.
“It feels like a heart attack but oh oh oh it must be love!”
Our Maker groans with us in our weakness.
Carbon fiber assembly has come a long way since Porsche Carrera GT (which also utilized a carbon fiber tub). 10 years ago, it took Porsche took five days to make the GT’s chassis. Today, Porsche and birth up to five 918 tubs a day thanks to new innovations in composites and assembly methods.
This month our kits included Bo Bunny's Weekend Market papers, jewels,trinkets and buttons. Our sketch, done by Lynette, calls for 4 photos. Here's my layout for April's Challenge:
His mind was a diamond drill that reached as close as any to the opaque stuff inside us all.
Golden Fleece - Our K.I.D.
I also quilted another donated top which came all the way from Holland and was made by Marijke Kleefman. Marijke made and donated 8 quilt tops which was incredibly generous.
and she is like "I need hooks for the kitchen" which she might as well have said in FRENCH because I have no idea what she means.
I loved walking into Ak-sar-ben (the name of the arena in Omaha—Nebraska spelled backwards) and smelling the cold, moist air of the rink. It still brings a smile to my face and joy to my heart just to remember the feeling. In 2010, my husband was given two tickets to a first-round Stanley Cup playoff game in Chicago, one of the best gifts he’s ever given me. The Black Hawks came from behind to tie the game, won it in overtime and went on to win the Stanley Cup. If you love hockey, it doesn’t get much better than that!
Nov 15hth – Norwich U.E.A. Thursday
When they got to the Bin Laden compound, according to the Guardian, the team sent a nurse inside to administer the hepatitis shots. The nurse, the newspaper wrote, “was unaware of the real purpose of the vaccination campaign.” So if the mission had gone wrong—the nurse was reportedly equipped with a “handbag that was fitted with an electronic device”—the first person in harm’s way would have been not a covert-ops cowboy but an actual health-care worker.
Records from the thirteenth century list a succession of Norman rectors, the first being Robert de Plessis in 1242. The church was beautified with four chantries in the middle ages. These probably lasted until the sixteenth century, when most such institutions disappeared. Beautiful stained glass windows from this era were however part of the church's treasures which survived into the new Protestant regime.
So, here we are. Once again we are going to be forced to endure the cramming of this propaganda down our throats for the next month, while more accurate polls are disregarded and ignored. Such is life when socialist statists are in charge. The state media is hard at work selling the delusion that Obama is a leader, just because he did one thing right.
This unique collection could be an excellent reference library for book collectors, distillers, importers, U.S. Bartender Guild Chapters, liquor distributors, Hotel Restaurant Administration colleges, etc.
(6) Matthias Loras, Bishop of Dubuque
Chef Stefano also made a foam using stock and lecithin which will allow the foam to hold its form for a long time. The risotto was cooked for a good 15 minutes until al dente, and served with seafood (prawns, scallops, mussels, squid) and foam.
Oh, and don't tell them there was no cream in it! Thickener? Cannellini Beans :)
Al Vescovo - guitar
The Grimm story tells of twelve beautiful princesses. Although they sleep in a locked bedchamber, their shoes are always found worn through the next morning, as if they had been out all night dancing. The king offers one of his daughters as a reward to the man who can discover the truth.
What's different about PANDAS kids is that they have these episodes, usually during cold and flu season, for several weeks, long enough for you to start thinking "oh, my god, my child is INSANE....and then, they GET BETTER. And they aren't crazy, tic-ing, repetitive, hyperactive nutballs anymore! They're fine!
Life is too short to be spent in judgment of others.
I told the kids to do their chores, but they were a bit fried from being home for 2 hours with Jake. Captain America got home at about that time, and let me just go hide in the bedroom. I know that "Johnny" will be here soon ,and it makes me irritable. Plus, I'd just found out from Andrea that they may or may not be closing the gate behind the school. So my kids would have to be dropped off and picked up from school (outside of post) everday. SO not cool. For one, it's their exercise. For another, I'd have to leave post to drop off/pick up the kids. That kinda requires a different level of readiness for the day, you know. Bras are kinda required. And I have to leave the house.
A truck driver, hauling a tractor-trailer load of computers, spots a good place to stop for a beer. As he approaches the bar, and sees a big sign on the door that says:
242Through dreary wastes, and weep each other's woe,
Caroline G is powering away on her next book (working title Molly Stone) and feeling a bit better having renegotiated the deadline!
Dogfish Head Sahtea: a rarely made Finnish style, typically weirded up by Calagione, with added Black Chai tea.
Not happy bunny day.
Morain himself makes an interesting captain. He’s got no interest in taking over Vela’s trade—he just wants to divide the ship’s cargo among the crewmen, hit the shore, and disappear. But what authority does one mutineer hold over twenty others? What’s to stop them from dividing the loot twenty ways instead of twenty-one? Morain is a tough brute, but he’s in trouble, and a movie exploring the depths of his situation could be a good one. But The Ship of Lost Men can’t be that film, because it needs Morain to retain his role as undisputed leader of the rabble—the man who can articulate the collective threat his crew presents to William Cheyne, a recently shanghaied American doctor, and the beautiful, wealthy, and fearful heiress, Ethel Marley.
Most whiskey is distilled twice, three times at most. Vodka is often distilled many more times, and Clix vodka is distilled 159 times! More distillations has to be better, doesn't it? At $300 it's certainly more expensive than any of Buffalo Trace's whiskeys, and hopefully, it will stay that way. Now keep in mind that I don't drink vodka and don't really like it, but then again, who does?
Why should anyone feel obliged to spoil their mother one day a year? I never expected my children to transform themselves into angels one day a year. Mothers do their mothering job and I for one never saw a need to be thanked for it.
I got to welcome a few more lovely followers to my ranks in various guises (Facebook and Twitter among others) so big smoochie hello's to you if you are new around here! A very very big thanks to Rebecca's endless support firstly, for the lovely post at Florence Finds featuring my lil' abode - I received so many genuinely kind comments that I was afraid I might have to hire a trailer to tow my head back home from work for fear it wouldn't fit in my Mini.
Hello all. As you know I use a lot of music to get me going while I write. Most of the time, it provides great inspiration for my characters as well as certain scenes they’re involved in.
4. While it didn’t happen at the beach, Saarah walked the entire way home! While this may not seem like a big deal, it was the very first time that she wasn’t being pushed, pulled, or carried up the hill from town. She has tiny legs, so it’s quite a feat. She was encouraged by promises of helping make Jell-O when we got home. Tevye was more excited by the fact that he had carried a pine cone the entire way. Wow, Tevye. Your sister accomplishes a huge feat, and you’re excited because you manage to hold on to an object weighing 25grams. Congratu-frigging-lations!
I am going to Paris!
a. By “your local” I mean whatever’s local to you – you can decide whether that means Eugene, the UO, your hometown, where you want to work … whatever.)
If you’re using fresh diced tomatoes (about three), put them in now and stir the dice around a bit, scraping up the brown bits on the bottom of the pan. Otherwise, pour in the chicken broth and do it then instead. Then add the canned tomatoes and let it all simmer, covered, for about fifteen minutes.
Dinner was at Takumi. They have the best sushi around, and we've come to know the head sushi chef and his two sidekicks. We always sit at the sushi bar and watch them make our food, and always end up ordering more and more. I didn't take pictures of everything we had, but here are a couple of the dishes:
-put veg oil in frying pan + put on high heat
guns. The protesters retaliated, beating some assailants.
Today is the day all Samsung lovers and all smartphone or gadget lovers are anticipating. It is finally here! The long awaited Samsung Galaxy SIII. Will it be awesome? Lets find out on the launch of the device in London at 7pm today (3rd May, 2012), which will be 2am (4th May, 2012) in Malaysia time. Staying awake for it?
For your hairstyle trial it’s important to bring any hair accessories you are planning on wearing -- tiara, headband, hairpins. You can also bring your veil to see how that will look. But make sure to have it pressed after the trial so it’s not wrinkled for the wedding. You may also want to wear a top that has a similar neckline to your wedding dress’ so you can see what the style will look like in a bodice of the same cut.
Once melted simply dip the toffee into the chocolate and then put it on the rack to cool, it's best if you can stick it in the fridge after a few minutes to cool it properly and allow the chocolate to get properly firm.
TUSCAN BEEF RIBS
"New Beginnings Academy"
where the house will be.
*Movement?: Constant....you would think a 10 pound baby wouldn't have any room to move, but this kid is a kung foo machine....always moving and grooving.
I'll try to stay very connected as I'm out and about on the tour, especially with Twitter since it's easiest. CLICK HERE to follow me there. I always seem to get very interesting drivers, so you don't want to miss out on that commentary....
But May 2nd, 1997 - it was a bright, sunny Friday morning and I was getting strapped down for an emergency C-section. I was terrified and literally shaking. He was three weeks early, a tad scrawny (half the size of either of his siblings) and needed to stay a few weeks in the NICU.
So….I signed up for both a New Year’s Eve 4 mile race and a New Year’s Day 5k race earlier this week.
Jean-Claude Brizard
campaign contribution if it was only worn to opposition events to remind them of how liberals twist the rules? By itself, this probably won't change many minds (and none at all among liberals). The real question ought to be if she cheated on this, what else has she cheated on? Between the number of registered Democrats, the out-of-state money being spent, the voter's general acceptance of the liberal line, the ACORN-like groups and their organized cheating at the polls, Brown is still the underdog, but by a little less. Ron P. Take your,
Martha thinks I'm so cute when I wake up and there's a perfect impression of QWERTY spelled backward on my cheek: YTREWQ.
Personality: ARTY FARTY
Paul quotes a ‘highly-placed source’ at home affairs as sayng that the NIA had ‘intercepted’ 14 reported members of the Al-Shabaab group at the Lebombo border post between South Africa and Mozambique in April. Amongst the 14 Al-Shabaab members was a chemistry-scientist and several teachers. Pauw’s source said the entire group was questioned and held in detention at the Komatipoort police station for several weeks – but that since then, ‘nobody knows what has happened to them.”
Workout: 30 day shred
4. Remove from the oven and drizzle a little balsamic vinegar over the hot onions. Allow the onions to cool completely.
I was pulling into a parking spot at Panera’s Cafe the other day when I encountered a moral dilemma. And it had nothing to do with the poaching of free wi-fi.
Wildcard 2
miracles and the reason is that I believe in God. If there’s God, He must be
This is what Paul is telling us: Christians are traversing from one glory to another glory, with the latter being exceedingly better than the first.
It's not my dress, but how I wish it were.... I know the woman who made it and I've more than once thought that I should commission her to make one for me. A blue one. Robin's egg blue... Alas, I don't really have that much cause to dress up at the museum so I probably won't. I also need my own corset (they are made to your body) and plan to take the next corset making workshop that I can get into-They fill up FAST!) Everything fits better in your own. The one I wear is a little big on me.
That's all for tonight. Today's post will be tomorrow, per usual. It was a wacky one.
Here's some more of the beautiful mask and the top cluster with Prima blooms and resin bird. The blue rose and pearl Sparkler is from Webster's Pages.
Because she completely puts me to shame, I asked Jill a few questions about writing, editing, and finding balance.
It was moved to it’s little corner in Beverly Hills in the 1930’s, became a private residence, and has been restored to it’s former glory by it’s current owner…and it IS quite glorious!
This is where feminism came in and unfairly pointed men in the direction against their true masculine and charming selves. A charming man does not drop his boxers or boxer briefs to get a woman. He maintains a masculine energy and control and frame. If the woman doesn’t respond quickly and favorably he moves on to the next. Most men are taught to keep doing and doing until she finally gives in and “falls in love with him” for all of his romantic nice gestures. In real life this only leads to disastrous results mainly for the guy.
I’ve done things that are wrong. I am the dark, the desperate, the ashamed.
happiness that I have encountered.
Limited-ammo weapons can be fired by any model (as normal), but those shooting must have LOS to the target.
Thank you for this question. I understand the situation and often find myself needing to be quite ruthless with my time and how I spend it. Distractions always present themselves throughout the day. We must consciously choose how to spend our time and where to place our energy.
Outside the CBS News’ Washington offices after the interview, media analyst Sam Husseini asked Powell what he knew about the torture of al-Qaeda suspect Ibn al-Shaykh al-Libi, who made false claims linking Saddam Hussein’s Iraq and al-Qaeda, lies that Powell then cited in his infamous pro-invasion speech before the United Nations on Feb. 5, 2003.
She tossed the rag into the bin and palmed the edge of the bar. “I don’t date sports players.”
Lieutenant Colonel Dhanajaya Naidoo of the CIU said in a sworn statement to the Hawks investigators that the KZN resort was for the exclusive use of Lazarus and other senior members of the CIU.
In fairness, the girls have very good voices. They're no Agnetha and Anni-Frid but they're nice and clear nonetheless.
I headed back to the bathroom and climbed into the shower.
Betrayal
My favorite part of this picture is the pug sitting in the driver’s seat. He is quite obviously the co-pilot. ”Ok, we have Kizzy, next let’s go pick up Daisy, then Jack. And hurry up! We are starting to run behind! The boss is going to be angry if we are late.”
15/08 18:20 W Shot Put Heptathlon
I went into my 'archives' stash and found the cute little metal star
Try to keep up with the facts, and most importantly, don’t question them. Actually, don’t even try to keep up with the facts, just take them for face value.
He sees all things. He is in all things. He knows all things.
Dear Department of Environmental Conservation:
For the most part, my class was enjoying their lunch, but apparently, there was some discord as other classes filed through the line filling their trays. Soon, one of the lunch ladies came out of the kitchen and announced to the students that they would be serving sweet potato fries from this point forward. Her explanation included the phrase, "the government says" a few times, and emphasized that they were just following regulations.
Level 6: MP Cost: 34, Duration: 96 seconds, Damage: +12%, Critical Rate: +12%, Minimum Critical Damage: +3%, Attacks up to 1 enemy.
Gender Sensitisation Committee against Sexual Harassment (GSCASH) was instituted in JNU in accordance with the Supreme Court guidelines in the Vishakha Judgment for the prevention of sexual harassment at the workplace. It was the students’ movement of this campus which demanded that GSCASH be put in place, as a result of which in 1998 it became the first such body to be established in the entire country. The progressive student’s movement also ensured elected students’ representation in GSCASH along with representation from all other sections of the campus. GSACSH was mandated to spearhead and strengthen the movement for a gender-just campus by fighting sexual harassment and patriarchy in all forms. Unfortunately, the institution seems to have replaced (or displaced) the movement rather than complementing it. And so, it has been easy for the administration to attack and weaken the GSCASH over the last few years. Today GSCASH stands severely weakened and constrained due to deliberate administrative assaults as well as in absence of a vibrant students’ struggle or women’s movement around it.
When I say RED put your hands on your head.
She has not been happy in her nursing home. There were times when she was very unhappy, and times when she seemed better satisfied, but about two weeks ago, she told me that she definitely wanted to move to a facility nearer to my home, a particular one that she has thought well of for many years. We went to see it and take the tour, and she asked me to start the process of applying.
What I would like to achieve in time for the hackathon is to transform this spreadsheet in to 3-star open data, in order that the developers there can turn it in to a sweet, sweet app.
In fact, if you want to make your own poetry using trademark sentences, the fine folks at trademarkedsentences.com have an addictive little application for such a thing here. As always, I’m never the first person to think of these things. I’m just the only one I know who would go at great length about it.
Wullie was suddenly filled with despair and horror. Big Jim's eyes seemed to bore into his soul. Chick Young's voice seemed now to crush the very life from Wullie's body. He balled his fists and began to pound upon the window.
Our new interim minister started this fall and I've been attending just about as many services as I can since he came. I even joined the choir, which means that on the Sundays we sing, I sit through both (almost identical) services!
Age: Over 40; not much but enough.
One of the qualities of a best friend is being there. Last week, one of my best friends told me that she had committed to spend significant time last week to figure out a direction she should go. I called her towards the end of the week and asked her about it.
It's worth remembering that if an editor or agent can’t connect with your characters and story, then the general reading public certainly won’t.
All Other Desserts -$8
Never the same perspective, always full of surprises. What you always loved about any of us individually, you can now get in one place. We may even jump in on topics together.
This is, at best, a glorified, trashy romance novel (but it's beyond me why it's been glorified), and at worst, a poorly written, piece of crap.
I loved seeing the girls winning in the end. (To a point: re, Evita. But even in death, she had the world at her feet. Sorry for the spoiler).
I ended up deciding to go with a cordless Black and Decker model. One of my friends tried to talk me out of, saying he had never had good results from a battery powered model, but I'm smarter than he is, so I took a chance on it anyway.
The bathrooms are all original and it could do with a new coat of paint inside but we're just going to take up the carpet and polish the floors. Put in pool safety in and I want to put some nice big modern pendant lights into the kitchen and dining.
Am OK..I will brief you in full as soon as I get home hopefully..Once he have the money wired kindly email me the confirmation control number...
Margarita Pizza:
Luke 2 finds us out in the field with the shepherds watching over their flocks by night. Sound familiar yet? I'm sure you remember that when the angels appeared, the shepherds were "sore afraid". So what do the angels say? Pretty sensibly, and predictably they say "Fear Not, for I bring you good news of Great Joy that is for all people. For today in the city of David there has been born for you a Savior who is Christ the Lord.". Okay. I get that. Angels talking to shepherds 2000 years ago about their immediate need. Doesn't really apply to me.
David Erickson, Tunheim Partners
A search term showed up on my blog the other day…
A few days ago we received a x-mas package from my gramps, my mom and Viola. Inside it, among other goodies, were 6 carefully wrapped mini-bundt fruitcakes. On the outside was written "Gluten Free!." Now normally, receiving a fruitcake in the mail might put a half-disgusted smile on my face, complete with a furrowed brow... but knowing well that my mom and Viola are amazing cooks, I knew I was in for a treat! I wasn't wrong. For the last two days I've been unable to control myself. I keep sneaking into the kitchen to cut off another slice. I've even pulled out the spoon and began eating the crumbs like cereal late at night.
I just couldn't get a decent picture of my face so just snapped a couple webcam pix.
“Wait a minute,” I said. “What if we’re getting rid of the wrong one? I mean, look at her. She clearly lost this fight. And we’ve only been here a week. What if she’s just getting still used to the place?”
At the micro level, the theory would suggest increasing the ‘supply’ of activist politicians.
Please leave links for Facebook, Twitter, or blog/website mentions. You MUST leave a way to contact you.
Phreak: What’s that?
My earliest memories include Star Trek to one degree or another. I wasn’t old enough to watch it during its original broadcast run, but I watched the reruns every day after school. Today, of course, we have the series literally at our fingertips: DVDs on the shelf, streaming over the internet, and even the video mp3 player in my pocket. There are books, comics, role-playing games, computer games, toys, models, websites, and pretty much anything you’d care to name. Today, Star Trek is everywhere. Maybe it’s not as hip or cool as other entertainment properties, but hold up a picture of the original Enterprise or Kirk and Spock, and most people will know what you’re talking about.
*Tell a story where you're looking forward.
And Freddie, wherever you are.
to simply be we.
I'll share the pictures in steps... today the decorations!
"assalamualaikum tuan, puan and a very good moring :) (to an indian panel)...". OMG selamat pagi la farhana! lalalla~ continued with my points and so on. tihihihi :D
" HE " knows of who I speak!
And do I ever need Him.
Last week it dropped down to 24 degrees, and this morning it was 25. Everything was icy, but it's amazing how quickly the cold hardy plants recover as soon as they defrost in the sun. A few hours after snapping this photo, you couldn't even tell the kale had been totally frozen.
For me, the most amazing book in the Bible is the book of Acts. It is full of action and advancement of the Good News about Jesus Christ. Acts shows the early followers of Jesus, unlike the Christians of today, turning the world upside down.
Look for me in the sunshine,
To unconditionally love and accept them for who they are.
am i ready to play hostess with the mostest?
04. Shanda Lea 2(2:58)
The Singer I just bought is similar to the "Famous" kind. There are no templates, and with various screws you can adjust not only the length of the hole and width of the stitching (bight), but also the width of the hole itself. Isn't that fantastic?
Till surrounded by mountains, we’re finally caught
This after watching my 6th grader play his first football game. Watching him play QB was a good mom moment. He got an interception, several tackles, and a touchdown.
And so one evening I announced that I was going for a run. Peachy was very confused as to why I would go out for a run. Obviously it was a foreign concept to her. Mr Cherry wished me well, but I could see the amusement in his eyes. But I went for it and came home huffing and puffing after about one mile. My Facebook status that evening was "I hit the pavement for the first time in 16 months." After that I may have opened my big mouth while out with friends one night that I would be running the 5k at the big marathon in town taking place in May. And do you know what? My friends were paying attention and remembered what I had said the next day. (How on earth did you remember that, Emily?) And one friend reminded me that I had said the same thing as I walked the very same event last May. (You have a good memory, Janet!)
"Hello Friend" stamp is from a stamp set I got at M's
Consecutive losses to Pittsburgh and Washington to end the regular season do not concern me. Nor does not winning the President's Trophy. None of that would have changed anything. The 2011-2012 regular season will still go down as one of the greatest campaigns ever in Blueshirt history.
Leda and the Swan
Did you know I can read minds? Especially the minds of waiters. I'm so good, I should have my own show like Ricky Lake, except I'll go from restaurant to restaurant and tell you on a scale from 1 to 10 how much the help despises you.
Modified, 12.30am
Article 27: If the parties wish to make a statement or a pleading, they should raise their statement or pleading, as well as the relevant facts, reasons and evidence before the copyright administrative management entity within seven days after notification of the defendant, or within 30 days of the day of issuance of the announcement. If the parties did not exercise their right statement or pleading within this period, they will be regarded as having renounced the right.
VIDAL: This is our position, I mean, for many years the Cuban
Giveaway ends 9/15/11 at 11:59pm PST.
To visit her friend Dream.
1 latent
One minute, they're standing, wobbling precariously. The next they're putting that first tentative foot forward, frowning with the difficulty of it all. And then, suddenly?
Here is another Project Kit Tutorial to add to your holiday collection- using the Contempo Christmas stamp set and Bright Christmas stamp set in the Holiday Mini. The tutorial will have pictures and step by step instructions for 4 cards and a Box Holder (3-D ) for the cards and envelopes. These cards are demonstrable and so easy to case and tweak.
Enjoy coloring the decorated eggs with colors from your color scheme. One egg was left plain so you can paper piece it.
this is a really sweet and sad shoujo because it’s so sweet and i cried at some moments but i loved it
The CTW had worked closely with the CIA on capturing al-Qaeda leaders and operatives over the years, and that cooperation remained intact in mid-2010, even as tensions between the two intelligence agencies were rising over the rapid increase in the number of spies the CIA had infiltrated into Pakistan that year, partly to keep tabs on ISI's relations with the Afghan Taliban and Haqqani network. So, it would not have been unusual for the CTW to bring the results of the investigation of Khan to the attention of the CIA.
- Potential markets for key applications of home automation, security and healthcare.
One day, in a fit of frustration, I declared that he could go cry, there, in that corner. And, make it loud, buddy! Get all those tears out so we can move on with our lives!
Tomorrow I go for broke.
Phephisle Maseko of the Traditional Healers Organisation said: “I can’t speak for others, but our members would never participate in muthi killings. We heal, we don’t kill. Those who kill for body parts are witches who don’t belong to any organisation. They haven’t been trained so they do as they please!” – AENS
Speaking of scientists dabbling with history, back to Professor Prothero. "Late Roman Alexandria was indeed a tolerant place" he tells us, "where the Egyptian, Greek, and Roman gods were still worshiped." There might be an alternative universe where pre-Christian Alexandria was a "tolerant place", but here in our world it was anything but. Novelist Mike Flynn's series of articles "The Mean Streets of Old Alexandria" show that Alexandria was a hotbed of street violence, political killings, factional brawling and inter-faith conflict long before Christianity was added to the mix. The city has the dubious distinction of being the site of several of the earliest recorded anti-Jewish pogroms. And the "tolerance" of this notably intolerant city did not extend to Christians for the first three hundred years of that faith's history. Like Manicheans, Alexandrine Christians were subjected to periodic bouts of Roman "tolerance" that involved "tolerant" things like being burned alive in arenas, being crucified and being fed to wild animals. As the man hanging in the cell in The Life of Brian said "Terrific people, the Romans". Very "tolerant".
I will say more about that later. I may even post pics. There are no booty dancing pics. This is probably a good thing. I have seen a few of the official race pics and there's enough blackmail material there.
But I didn’t.” Fine.I will go.Just let me sleep for a few more minutes.”, I tried to force a smile,and failed royally at that.
14 every
In our Vedic knowledge, it is said in the form of shloka – In the space, first there was air, from the air fire arose, from fire water, and from water earth was created. The idea behind giving water to fire is that we go back to ourselves. From water to fire, fire to air and then, we do pranayama after giving arghya to the sun – we go to the air element. From the air we go to the space and then sit in meditation. All these are different types of stories; examining them more deeply reveals something new.
At this point, I’ve been here so long that I have to really stop and pause to think of the ‘Country A word’ for certain things. I’ve always felt more at home stepping off the plane here than when I go back to Country A. Again, ask me and I’ll tell you more about that sometime.
Stabilo pencil (on the checkout counter at Paper Niche)
I have kept a small notebook near me over the past week. Every time I thought of something that was a problem prior to seeing our nutritionist, I would write it down. Being that memory was one of my issues, I thought this would be a great way to take the time to come up with this and be thorough. I thought it would be good to post these problems, however embarrassing they may be, in the hopes that I can reach and help someone else out there.
I am not thrilled with these Surefit dining chair covers. They are too thin and the wrinkles are hard to get out. I am just happy that I got them for about a quarter of their original price. I would NEVER pay full price for them. I expect them to rip after a few uses. Here is a pic of the color that I was happy to note goes quite nicely with the table runner I brought up from the basement yesterday:
-Strawberries, because he can’t pass the seeds (that’s what he told Alyssa when she asked why he didn’t like them) but it’s a complete lie!
Time for a new challenge at Anything Goes and this time we want to see Things with Wings. The DT have designed some great projects - as usual, so do pop over and have a look.
"Nid hawdd fy nala”
will it catch on? sure. will it do to facebook what facebook did to myspace? no. google’s not even going to try. they just want a social site to search so they can say they have social search and they want ad revenue. pissing off the facebook guys is just a bonus.
Me: It was trash!!!
Neighbor Kid #1: I’m going to tell all my friends at school, on my soccer team and my grandparents about all of this!
Alex North Belle Reeve (Capitol)
I’ll post again with the second half of the GBW wrap up with all the award results, the fun and beery frivolity of the BeermenTV Hair of the Dog Breakfast, The Local Taphouse Kiwi SpecTAPular and the Good Beer Week Flagship event, The Great Beer Debate. If you don’t have a ticket yet, you can call Siobhan at Beer Deluxe or go to the Good Beer Week website. It’ll be bigger than King Kong’s bollocks.
(3) With the refrigeration method, I found it harder to control the consistency of the dough, making it harder to cut out the cookies. Sometimes, if I left it in for too long, the lump of dough would be too cold to even roll out. Then, if I left it out to warm a bit, it might get too soft, then I'd end up freezing it anyway, after I rolled it out.
Lilly: How'd you get that punch to the stomach, Roy?
That’s it for today. Get back to those keyboards, and we’ll meet back here in a few of days.
I just ate most of the rest of the stale doughnuts. Then I drove across the street to the Y. Even though I had licked them off, my fingers were still sticky, which meant I had to drive by touching the steering wheel only with my palms. Fortunately, I didn't have far to go.
Hello! Sorry its been a while, but yes, I have indeed been doing Beautiful Things.
I am also inspired by the photos I take – mostly of my kids. Since I started scrapping in 2008 I find that when I take a photo now, I am instantly thinking of how it could be incorporated into one of my layouts.
An enjoyable film but not one of the Coen brothers’ best in my opinion.
So, for you, my friend, please don’t keep asking that stupid question. You don’t have to be good to be my friend because I too, realize that I’m not a good friend for you. The most important thing is, we understand each other’s badness and goodness, that’s why we can be a good friend. J
If I have had a constructive mental process, I would have given a pat on my back! On the other hand, my imagination turned my dream into a disaster. I shook myself and start to think about why that happened. First of all, I am surprised that due to an unexpected turn in my life, I am in the habit of imagining the worst as opposed to the best, unless my thoughts are directed differently.
So, their books and various claims have all been launched from that poison pen.
What about you? What new things have you received as gifts or have you bought for yourselves lately?
let me be the thought that
1 tablespoon of Galliano or Rum
The feel is thick and sticky. It's creamy, and the wheat beer definitely has the influence on this one. All told, it's actually a solid mix. The hops and wheat play nicely in the sandbox.
My doctor had me take it cycle days 5-9, but since I tend to ovulate early (or used to back when I ovulated on a regular basis) I took it cycle days 3-7 and should be ovulating soon.
(2) hows about an outfit made up of some of the oldest pieces in your closet? since you rotate and consign clothes so often, we see lots of new-to-you items, but im interested in seeing what some of the oldest pieces are that you have hung on to."
This week we want to see your cards, but we don't want you to use any Die-Cutting machines or punches....so NO nesties, NO punches, put away those Sizzix & Cuttlebug machines and embrace your trimmers.
Under Prime Minister Binyamin Netanyahu, the government initiated a policy to demolish unauthorized Jewish homes on private Palestinians property.
Artifact p/p - base
they will flog him and kill him.
Through the roar and crackle of the fires, music sounded, a quick pulsing primal rhythm that struck at the soul and demanded answering. I spotted a group of masked musicians who sat out of the way of the guests. They played with unrestrained enthusiasm. Women and men alike began dancing, interweaving with each other, touching hands held high and swirling about one another. I tapped my foot in time, wishing for my inhibitions to leave me and the courage to answer the trilling pipes and pounding bodhran.
We found in the Czech Republic and Denmark, fewer places that served fine cakes and pastries. Often dessert menu did not venture too far beyond strudel. No matter. By then, our stomachs needed to be tamed away from desserts for more goulash or alas, boiled over-salted spinach.
When you try your best but you don’t succeed
¤ Do You Suffer from Frequent Sleep Disorders?
I have been wearing them with a pair of skinny jeans and some 6 inch heels – make myself feel more feminine ha! And tucked into high waisted shorts. I just love how they feel – aren’t too tight and they are still flattering. As my boyfriend buys size mediums and I’m only a size small I am going to have to start buying my own, his tend to bury my shape a little bit too much!
However, He gave him the mitzvah of milah. On the surface this commandment looks cruel and painful. Avraham was told to do an act of din. He needed to learn that although the world is grounded on chesed, it also needs din to survive. S’dom had to be destroyed because the world cannot tolerate absolute evil forever. Avraham needed to learn that unbridled love can be devastating. Therefore his prayers failed. On his personal being, he had to undergo milah, a painful mitzvah. This was because Avraham, the epitome of chesed, needed to pick up an element of din in order to become tamim – perfect. Therefore, Hashem told him about the birth of Yitzchak immediately
So we ran around the square that was just a couple blocks away. And then ran back.
Your book is published with the same care and attention that it took you to write it. When you publish your book with Spire Publishing it can be designed, published and available for purchase worldwide within six weeks.”
The spot on treatment is not only for spots but can also be used to treat cuts and bites. It is so concentrated and tiny it would be ideal to take on holiday as I will be doing : )
Roukens de Lange, A (1980). Technological and Socio-economic Change in South Africa: Where Are We Heading? S A Journal of Science, 76(10):445-450.
Today, I officially loathe mosquitoes, because yesterday while I was swimming in my backyard pool that bit my face 5 times. I am really unlucky. What is worse, is that I thought I was bitten once, until my Dad pointed out the other 4.
But...when I started spraying, the paint was blotchy and the sprayer kept clogging. Then I remembered! I hated the stuff when I first used it. And when I finished my project 2 years ago, I wasn't very happy with the spotty results. Plus, the "chalkboard" didn't erase very well.
-A Valley Without Wind: Okay I will admit I was incredibly wary of this one. I’m an AI War/Tidalis superfan so Arcen has my good will but it seemed like the art for this one was wicked wonky and it went from top-down to 2D platformer overnight for some reason. Really dodgy seeming! BUT then I played it. It’s a randomly generated metroidvania set in a weird post-apocalyptic world and you can shoot lightning at skeleton robots. AND every time you die, “you” stay dead, you pick a new character and can find your old shit and you can build towns over time and it’s just in general really neat. Also, I may have accidentally told the artist that I didn’t like his work at first accidentally. I like it now though, guy! It’s cool!
In the picture on the top, Mashi Chan has a line by the same character on her shirt, which says, "Sweet Mpther of Tink!" She's also sporting a red bandanna as the character does at a point in the story as a simple of peace.
--Where is this blog going? How can I advance it to where I want it to be?
Because postage to overseas can be prohibitive I am willing to give a $5.00 book certificate to international winners - Amazon, Barnes & etc....you tell me where and I'll set it up. So for my overseas visitors your comment may indicate a smaller book and I'll check postage or note your choice of gift card.
I guess life is what happens while we are making other plans. My doctor called me yesterday with the results of my blood test from two weeks ago. I tested positive for a blood disorder called Anti-Thrombin III Deficiency. I don’t quite understand it yet but I’m sure I will have a better explanation after I visit the hematologist.
That was a very very long night.
A good night’s sleep
5) Add the slices to the bottom of an oven proof dish and cover with half of the milky mixture. Scatter the soaked sultanas and layer more slices of panettone until it reaches the top of the dish and cover everything with the rest of the milky mixture. Leave to absorb for 5mins.
reliable to the source of living
Later this year we are planning a short film event in support of National Red Head day. Any read headed filmmakers or films where the central character is a red head, you will want to be part of this. Please get in touch with us for more details
Others might say "annoyingly evenhanded" and still others would describe it as too in favour of one side or the other. There was one chap demonstrating outside with a placard saying that a disabled man had been murdered by terrorists for being a Jew and that we patrons should "enjoy your evening at the ENO". A woman told him that she had seen the opera before and that he should see it for himself and she offered to buy him a ticket. He refused. John Adams has a huge reputation as a very accomplished composer. The librettist, Alice Goodman, was never commissioned again.
There are about 30 blogs that I have yet to look over and categorize on top of the ~300 Related Blogs from the original lists. They’re all pending while I work on:
Creativity is hidden within like my thoughts wearin camo.
All I know is this-I am sure to be sobbing uncontrollably no matter what day I take the exam, whether I pass or fail. The huge pit in my stomach probably won't go away until I pass though.
Thank you Carey for making such a fun devotional to help me with my walk and get focused on God first thing in the day and throughout the day as well. It reminds me that God craves a relationship with me, just like I should with him every day. Thank you for making me hungry to be in the ever so sweet presence of God.
“… influenced by changes in culture, society, economics, art, and literature—globalization—many different schools and strands of haiku developed during the 20th century. … Starting with a foundation centered more on realism and experience, 20th century haiku immediately expanded into areas such as politics, subjectivity, the avant-garde, feminism, urbanism, surrealism, the imaginary, symbolism, individuality, and science fiction: in general, free-form and experimental aesthetics. … The rigid limitations and conservatism of traditional techniques (namely 5-7-5 on/syllabets and the necessity of a kigo) were no longer absolutes for Japanese poets.”
anyway, i wanted to take a minute to write about an interaction with my 11 year old son. it made me so proud it took my breath away…
I really struggle with not "praising". We try not to say "Good Job" and instead might say "That was FAST running!" I tend to tell him he is CUTE ... A LOT! What else can I say? He IS freakin' adorable and charming....
Now, that I have the idea and some elements it's time to start with the object.
Ballast Point Even Keel; San Diego, California, American Pale Ale, 3.5% abv
In the morning glad I see
And wouldn’t you know it, I GOT HIT IN THE FACE BY ANOTHER SOCCER BALL!!!!!
When a loved one has Alzheimer’s disease, families can help keep the memories alive by telling stories and recalling special moments together.
Personal Space; the behavioral basis of design, by Robert Sommer. A must-read for any architecture, exhibition, or interior, design student. A very interesting study on the impact of people on design, and design on people.
NamcoBandai reported that a last generation game could cost as little as 400K$ to as much as 4M$. When the PS3 was launching EACanada stated development costs could cost upwards of ten million higher for PS3 then a 360 game. It was estimated to cost upwards of 30M for a PS3 game.
The five-judge Sala also voted to make legislative elections more direct. It ruled as unconstitutional the practice by which voters in legislative elections picked parties but not individual candidates. Previously, voters would determine the number of AL seats each party would hold. But it was the leadership in those parties that selected who exactly would fill those seats.
To me, cheating on Optifast is different than cheating on other diets. It is a medically supervised diet. The doctors expect you to follow the program, and they base their decisions and care on the assumption that they know what exactly you are eating. The program is also expensive, so cheating on it is cheating yourself, big time, in terms of money and successful weight loss.
We're currently working with a company to get from 1x to 6x in many different styles, but we don't really know what you want / need /desire exactly.
Still I am mad. I am mad that the people who have stuck out through the bad times in Coney Island and SHOULD BE LANDMARKED are being asked to leave. Authenticity is being sacrificed for most likely a re-creation. Will the new places have old photographs of Coney Island and hand painted signs? I would put money on it that they will. But they won't be THE REAL THING. They will be simulations in corporate chain restaurants. UP SCALE is the word Italian developer and evictor Zamperla,is loving to use, when describing what they "envision for Coney Island".
Eventually, the old lady breathed her last one day. Everyone mourned her death and even more the loss of a great cook. After all the rites were over the daughter searched her mother’s cupboard an found that small tin labelled ‘secret ingredient’. Finally, she thought she would come to know of her mother’s secret. She opened the tin with shaking hands and peered in. Inside was a piece of paper with a single word written on it….
Adding to the list of great bands comes Captain, We’re Sinking! CWS is another fantastic punk band out of the Scranton, PA scene. There aren’t many bands anymore that when you first hear them, you know you’ve hit gold. When I first started listening to CWS, I instantly knew this band was special and I haven’t stopped listening since.
I got myself in a bit of a state earlier today. A giant rough penny may have dropped on my head as I realised today that something was clearly amiss, and probably had been for a while. I feel terribly guilty for not having seen the signs sooner. Or did I? Did I notice things and just not put the old two and two together?
CSIRO v. Buffalo Technology, Inc., E.D. Tex. (6:06-CV-324), June 15, 2007
How it came about was, I tasted her 'Beef Curry' during breakfast, eating it with 'Roti Canai'. It was very tasty, so I asked her to cook me 'Chicken Curry' instead of 'Beef Curry' to bring home.
Due to their support of islamic jihad terrorism, the FBI is officially banned from dealing with CAIR and related islamic supremacist terror supporting Muslim Brotherhood front groups. You can read about that HERE.
Deputies called for Charlotte County Fire/EMS to respond; the boy’s mother refused medical treatment and said she would take her son to the hospital Emergency Room. Doctors advised deputies that they told the mother to observe her child for 24 hours due to a possible concussion. Deputies notified the Department of Children and Families.
Then you see this, which shockingly was occupied (as of last month, at least):
No scripture this time, just a thought. I am hardly alone in my occasional discomfort over the historical association between Mormonism and polygamy, and so I think it's worthwhile to share the latest thing I've told myself about it.
That just explains why I could eat so much, it doesn’t explain my fidgety eat. Looking back, I’m pretty sure this developed in middle school. The initial cause was probably that I’d been put on a steroid inhaler. As we all know, steroids make you hungrier. I gained 50lbs that year. It is when I tipped the scales between overweight and obese. What started as a result of that steroid became a habit, in truth, an addiction. It was this addiction that I transferred over to Tony my senior year of college and first year of graduate school.
Openness upon openness is the hallmark of a responsible teaching of nonduality. In other words, be open and check your openness. As teachers we are constantly drawing lines and creating duality, therefore the responsible act is to erase those lines as we draw them.
8 ounces bittersweet chocolate, chopped
A stream of highly charged particles from the sun is headed straight toward Earth, threatening to plunge cities around the world into darkness and bring the global economy screeching to a halt.
As she did not mark our arrival, so shall she be similarly aloof as we take
1/4 lb. Crystal 40L
Have I ever mentioned that I love to cook? Mostly cause I'm a fatso at heart and I love to eat. This week I've been trying to change things up in our house and make a few new recipes.
I am looking forward to that. Just like to Mr. Stern’s debut on AGT later this month (May 24th, NBC).
The ancient landmarks one by one
Peel and pit the apricots. Cut them into wedges. Sprinkle with lemon juice.
Yeah, there I was little mister Kensington Stories with a great big plastic orange hat over my little head. And the same punishment was doled out for my older brother Joseph too.
In a long-delayed death penalty case, Manuel Adriano Valle is due to be executed today in Florida, says the St. Petersburg Times. Jeneane Skeen will be watching in the execution chamber. Valle killed her father, Coral Gables police officer Louis Pena, 33 years ago. For decades, she and her family pleaded for justice. They wrote to six governors to sign Valle’s death warrant. Gov. Rick Scott finally did 12 weeks ago, his first execution.
The July 29th phantom creeps up again, but this time he is defeated! Q2 lists it as the 29th, but apparently it is actually tonight (if only I knew about it sooner, and it weren't 95 degrees).
Ollie Mitchell - Trumpet
And then I died again.
Welp. no more! Not sure if it was the birthday (in general) or just me beginning to see myself in a new light as I train for this 5k race in April that is responsible. But I am totally feeling it, seeing it and reveling in it. FINALLY!
My very kind colleague recently went to HK on vacation, and offered to help me CP some stuff since I had done the same for her when I went to TW previously. Not wanting to bother her too much, I merely wrote down 3 items I had major lemmings for. This is what she got for me from HK and I was beyond happy when she came back to the office and handed this bag over to me (my other colleagues thought the bag spelled Faeces -_-)
School trip groups can learn about the masterful architectural vision of Isambard Kingdom Brunel, the civil engineer who built the Clifton Suspension Bridge, Brunel’s Old Station and many other iconic buildings in Bristol.
He may have signed the Patriot Act extension, but what about the Mengele torture regimen that Republicans in Congress wanted instituted in the detention centers?
So what if all food was good for us. I think that would be both a good thing and a bad thing. Knowing that anything we want to eat is healthy we might be tempted more to overeat. Even food that is good for us shouldn’t be eaten in mass quantities beyond what our bodies need. And if its all good for us where is the fun in sneaking a treat – but are there any treats when its all healthy? More things to wonder. On the bright side we could eat what tastes good, like chocolate, any time we want without guilt. We could eat ONLY chocolate if we choose because there is no need to endure foul tasting food. So what happens to the foods that people don’t really like the taste of? They would never be eaten. Don’t you eat certain foods only because you know its good for you? I think alot of people do. I’m sure alot of people only eat vegetables for their health benefits. I do like alot of different vegetables but I choose those I like or, sometimes, the ones that are cheapest because I know I ‘should’ eat some kind of vegetables daily. No more! If I can eat anything I want and get the same health benefits I’ll take cheesecake thank you!
I poked down my big ole Blue Willow platter by Churchill to be the backdrop for this Blueness. I have used my Blue biscuit jar too. It's really not vintage but it is almost 20 years old and holds tea bags.
In the last 1,200 years of Islam, just 100,000 books have been translated into Arabic, about what Spain does in a single year. Seven out of 10 Turks have never even read a book. Sennels points out the difficulties this creates for Muslims seeking to succeed in the West. "A lower IQ, together with a religion that denounces critical thinking, surely makes it harder for many Muslims to have success in our high-tech knowledge societies."
(I could see if you deep fried food this recipe would come in handy, as the ingredients would be good taste of spices.)
Of course that sent me off to the game room and then into the secret passage and up into Elise’s room. You have to slay the spirits of Everling’s six daughters to get further along. Somehow I managed to bumble through that, find all six, and meet up with Alexa again, all rather quickly.
true, or would you
7. Substitutionary Atonement and Cultic Terminology in Isaiah 53
The Atlantic mocks the Department of Homeland Security’s (DHS) Future Attribute Screening Technology (FAST) for attempting to screen terrorists based on physiological and behavioral cues to analyze and detect people demonstrating abnormal or dangerous indicators.
-- I made a silly mistake and put a dirty cover on the pool the other day.. It rained.. a lot.. The rain water pushed the cover into the pool and all the dirty junk got in the pool – Rookie mistake – I spent the day cleaning leaves and junk from the pool and tidying it up with chemicals. It hasnt even been up for a week and the filter is already disgusting. I havent gotten in it yet because the water is too cold for me. When it warms up a bit more Im sure Ill enjoy it, but not yet ;)
I love the comments and look forward to your thoughts.
Almost three years ago now. It feels like I can count my grief in rings. The years of famine and grief and withering mark me, gnarled and grey. I looked dead once, but I am green again. I have a knot in the middle of me that small rodents crawl into and make a home. The knot feels like a hole, but it is a home. I must remember it. I cry again and know that the tears carve something like a chasm of love. They formed the knot and the hole and the gulf between before and after and everything falling inside of it.
Vinay: I learned as much as I could about UC Berkley and what they wanted in their students and I customized my application to them. I tailored my essay just for them….I wrote 23 drafts before I thought it was ready to send.
masculine archetypes -"is quite a popular conception now."
Paper: Whisper White, Pear Pizzazz
Then on to The United Nations: Malcolm X’s High Court. The body to whose attention Malcolm passionately believed America’s racial injustices should be brought forth – and punished.
1 Cor 5:3,12 (NIV) Even though I am not physically present, I am with you in spirit. And I have already passed judgment on the one who did this, just as if I were present… What business is it of mine to judge those outside the church? Are you not to judge those inside? God will judge those outside. “Expel the wicked man from among you.”
7. Charles Bronson - You Will Go (Steve Caballero)
"Jimmy" is a cover of "Jimmy Jimmy Jimmy Aaja," a Hindi song, from the 1982 Bollywood movie Disco Dancer, performed by Parvati Khan, written by Bappi Lahiri and influenced by Nazia Hassan's (Pakistani) album Disco Deewane (1981). M.I.A.'s cover features different orchestration and beats from the previous version, and original English lyrics written by Arulpragasam. "Jimmy Jimmy Jimmy Aaja" itself sampled the French pop song "T'es OK!" (English version "You're OK") by Ottawan.
Alright, back to the story.
To make matters worse, Taslin spoke, in a voice smooth with the assurance of experience. "In truth, Rel's right. I was taught that it's good manners to laugh when humans do."
As for bartering I doubt it will suddenly stop (we still do it now), but it needn’t be the corner stone of our society. We left bartering behind for money as it provided a better system at the time, so perhaps we can leave money aside for something new too. When the financial crisis hit we may have lost a lot of points on the stock market in some computer somewhere, but our ability to produce only went down in respect of how many people were still employed. If everybody who was in work before the crisis hit then went out and did the exact same job the day after the crisis – we would have produced the same amount of tangible goods and services as before. Our ability did not change overnight, what did was our incentive.
Through innovation and technology, staff can work at any location and be easily connected by phone, mobile device, web or cloud-based applications. All current technology methods make communication and business functions more smooth and easy. Businesses that can provide work-life balance flexibilities and mechanisms, can ensure the work can get easily done from any location. Collaboration across units, teams and partners can happen seamlessly with the implementation and the availability of smart technology in your organization.
Other than that I have no criticisms. I’m not a horror fan and there are major gaps in my viewing. I’ve not seen Wolfen, The Howling, Bad Moon, The Company of Wolves, I was a Teenage Werewolf, Wolf, Blood and Chocolate, An American Werewolf in Paris, Silver Bullet… I’ve not even seen Teen Wolf for Christ’s sake. There is an entry on IMDB for The Last Werewolf but I’m not sure I’d go and see it if it gets made. I think what works about the book would be hard to transfer to the screen. I’m talking about the introspection (even when Jake transforms we’re still in his head). As a thriller that just happens to revolve around a werewolf, it will make a perfectly decent film if handled with a little finesse. But I can’t see them improving on the book.
The accident happend between 6:30 and 7 a.m., troopers said.
It's very pleasant but very like the Real Thing. I suspect you could easily sing Can't Get By Without You right over the top of it.
More scope to indulge a whole range of interests here, including local history, military history or world history. It might be a biography of Anne Boleyn, a book on World War II aircraft, a study of the American civil war, or something with a much smaller focus, like Bill Bryson's At Home or Mark Kurlansky's Salt: A World History. Whatever floats your boat!
even solid steel
Taylor Kitsch as Alex Hopper, kind of idiotic person at the beginning of this movie. At the end he become captain because other crew make him captain by simply calling him captain in panic situation, and also maybe he is the senior in the ship crash. (Spoiler: 2 out of 3 Destroyer got crash by alien.)
Erin Macintyre never expected to be a widow and a new mother in the same year, anymore than she expected mysterious notes, threatening phone calls, and a strange homeless man who seems to know all about her. The thought of raising a child without a father is daunting enough—worse when you have no idea who might want to harm you. Put an old flame into the mix, and her life begins a tailspin into a world she never knew existed.
The golden apples of the sun.
Most women are smart enough to know that real life has no violins swelling behind the drop-dead-gorgeous hero professing love in a dramatic sunset. They can be entertained by the ideal of the story without turning it into some kind of impossible relational checklist.
Flesh doesn’t really win. Flesh never really wins. Flesh lost that day on the cross when the sky turned black and the curtain was torn, yet we continue to live our lives as if we are powerless over our flesh. Granted, we, in and of ourselves, are powerless, but that isn’t the point. The point is that we don’t have to be powerless. We can win. We can be free from our flesh and even when we aren’t, even when flesh does win, the victory still belongs to Christ.
Creeped into a silent house, ascended to a cold made bed and smothered my self in fast becoming dreams. By the morning I felt strange, a disturbance at 1:30am and a text message at 8am.
Context is key to fully appreciate the greatness of Henri-Georges Clouzot’s Le Corbeau. Shot in the first year of the Nazi occupation of France under the watchful eye of German-controlled Vichy France, and by logical extension, the film industry, through Continental-Films (who understood the value of movies as propaganda better than they?), Clouzot’s film had to walk quite a tightrope in order to escape the censor’s scissors. Not only that, it had to withstand the attacks of French patriots who viewed Clouzot’s willingness to work with the German controlled film institute as proof that he was in the first rank of collaborators: A man who had sold his soul to the Devil just so he could continue to make movies.
Osorto argues that the parties were in the middle of discovery at the time the order granting summary judgment was entered. Specifically, Osorto contends that there were outstanding discovery responses as to the original note, mortgage and assignments of the subject note, and the mortgage. Specifically, Osorto argues that the court ordered Deutsche Bank to provide better responses to production of documents and, specifically, to provide the pooling and servicing agreement pinpoint cite. Because a better response was ordered, Osorto concludes that there was outstanding discovery when the motion for summary judgment was granted.
Another of the sloshing organs detaches itself from her body, and another, until all but one have wrenched themselves free from her bleeding, puckered skin. She nearly slips into unconsciousness, but the last organ, placed directly under her bosom, suddenly squeezes itself tight. Her eyes bulge horrifically as she feels the strange fluid being injected into her body, first cold and then hot. She starts to spasm violently as the liquid makes its way through her bloodstream, her veins bulging under her skin.
Brownie recipe of your choice (I’ve personally never found a homemade brownie recipe that I think is better than the Betty Crocker box mix, so I used that)
Chad Johnson
Starring: Michael Fassbender, Carey Mulligan and James Badge Dale
I saw Dr. P today, as Dr. M was again taking a vacation day. The appointment part was fairly serious (Dr. P, too, has a pretty good sense of humor), but he goofed a bit afterwards as we attempted to get me in for a pre-consult with anesthesia. As for the appointment, it was pretty typical- baby’s heartbeat, blood pressure, etc. Morgan still appears, well, from his pushing and feeling from the outside, to be head down (good girl). She was in an odd position today, though, so we had a difficult time hearing the heartbeat the way Dr. P wanted to. Apparently, the beat makes a ‘whoosh’ sound when it is traveling away from the Doppler and the actual ‘beat’ when it is traveling towards it. We eventually heard her heartbeat the ‘normal’ way it typically shows up and it was around 146 bpm. Then, I made a comment about the Herrington rods in my back (from scoliosis surgery) and he noted that he wanted me to do a pre-consult with anesthesia as to whether or not that would interfere with an epidural.
One of our least conventional choices has been our decision to co-sleep. We sleep in a family bed, a giant room-consuming contraption composed of two queen-sized mattresses pushed together to form one giant mega-bed. We've been doing this in one form or another from the beginning, and it definitely works for all of us. After a number of different combos over the years, we settled into an sleep order about three years ago that we're all comfortable with: me on the left, followed by Kai, Ging, and Kade. The boys have an option to change, or to have their own room, but they are very happy with the current arrangement. So we're happy, too.
Huntsman: the American people lost -
In another hadith related by Anas ibn Malik;
Well, the reasons are two fold. “Sweet Mother of God” is an expression I used to always say in a very, over-the-top, dramatic, American, fashion, in regards to things that really shouldn’t have required such a deep level of reaction at all. What I mean is, “Sweet Mother of God” should be said during an earthquake when you are standing in front of a wall that is about to fall on your head, not when you’re at the coffee shop and the baristas have replaced your soy milk with heavy cream. The latter is when I most commonly used it. I say “dramatic AMERICAN fashion” because Americans are overly dramatic. I read a fascinating article once that talked about human communication styles. It said that North Americans tend to be more emotional when they are expressing things. For example, when you are speaking to a North American they want to know how you FEEL about what they are saying. They want you to express this feeling in your response. This has developed in our culture because we are closer to Latin America and have therefore, co-opted their communication style. The British, though, communicate differently. The article went on to say this is because Britain is closer to Asia and Asian cultures have their focus when communicating on LISTENING. Fascinating, eh? (That was for the Canadians.) After living in Britain for several years, this rang very true to me, as I always felt like I was trying to tap dance faster and faster for my British friends while storytelling and the faster I tapped, the harder they tried to listen. “Two nations separated by the same language,” INDEED.
We managed to get a shot of everyone at the table but neglected to get pics of the food. Sorry about that. Too much vina and not enough concentration.
How unfair it is that small online merchants are being screwed by unfairly high fees by Taobao, the eBay of China.
Narrow Gauge is the premier country rock dance band in Wyoming and we travel throughout the state. Whether your event is in Cheyenne, Laramie, Casper, Jackson, Gillette, Rock Springs, Sheridan, Riverton, Green River, or anywhere in -between, Narrow Gauge can perform for your party. We also travel throughout Colorado, New Mexico, Nebraska, South Dakota, and Texas.
We arrived too early to get inside, so we walked across the street to the Cannery shopping center. We window-shopped and I picked up a few items. In a t-shirt store, I saw one with a triggerfish, called "humuhumunukunukuapua'a" in Hawaiian. I taught Tony to say this long word several years ago! Just below the triggerfish, it read, "Humuhumunukunuku, yada yada, yeah whatever."
A crazy woman.
to me that you liked the panel. I think the black colorway had more preferences, but the blue
But oh well.
Corie Caraway, deputy district attorney, did agree that the collection of evidence via GPS tracking device violates Perkins-Grubbs rights protected by the Fourth Amendment as laid out in the recent Supreme Court decision, which calls for a warrant in any case of GPS surveillance. However, Caraway feels that because officials acted in good faith, there was no reason the evidence should be deemed inadmissible.
To be fair, the scene in Liberty Plaza seems messy and chaotic. But it’s also a laboratory of possibility, and that’s the beauty of democracy. As opposed to our monoculture world, where political life is flipping a lever every four years, social life is being a consumer and economic life is being a timid cog, the Wall Street occupation is creating a polyculture of ideas, expression and art.
After having spent 25 years as a top-ranked equestrian on the national horse show circuit, Nancy serves as a performance consultant to competitive athletes and professional artists. She lives in Manhattan with her husband and two daughters.
* The grandmother from Wales who asked for EXPENSES to pay for the repair of a broken mangle. "It's the only bit of enjoyment I get out of life - not having to wear damp clothes" she sighed before returning to a morning of hand washing.
The author is Ruth Rendell too, of course, and it's hard to choose one from among her many outstanding books. These are always on sale in charity shops so pick any, really. I chose this one because it's set in the hot,hot summer of 1976 but ASTA'S BOOK or A DARK-ADAPTED EYE will do just as well.
To commemorate the centenary of the founding of the Royal Flying Corps and link to the Sepia Saturday theme of Flight, I present my great uncle Albert (1885-1976), standing (left) by his Sopwith Camel. He was two years older than my grandfather Sydney and was the middle child of my great-grandparents, William Joseph and Mary Jane. At the start of the First World War he was an apprentice joiner, but joined the South Notts Hussars in 1914, later transferring to the Royal Flying Corps, first as an airframe rigger, and then a rear gunner.
(COWPEA) * California Water Resources Control Board * California Welfare to Work Division * California Wetlands Information System * California Wildlife and Habitat Data Analysis Branch * California Wildlife Conservation Board * California Wildlife Programs Branch * California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) * California Workers Compensation Appeals Board * California Workforce and Labor Development Agency * California Workforce Investment Board * California Youth Authority (CYA) * Central Valley Flood Protection Board * Center for California Studies * Colorado River Board of California * Counting California * Dental Board of California * Health Insurance Plan of California (PacAdvantage) * Humboldt State University * Jobs with the State of California * Judicial Council of California * Learn California * Library of California * Lieutenant Governors Commission for One California * Little Hoover Commission (on California State Government Organization and Economy) * Medical Board of California * Medi-Cal * Osteopathic Medical Board of California * Physical Therapy Board of California * Regents of the University of California * San Diego State University * San Francisco State University * San Jose State University * Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy * State Bar of California * Supreme Court of California * Teach California * University of California * University of California, Berkeley * University of California, Davis * University of California, Hastings College of the Law * University of California, Irvine * University of California, Los Angeles * University of California, Merced * University of California, Riverside * University of California, San Diego * University of California, San Francisco * University of California, Santa Barbara * University of California, Santa Cruz * Veterans Home of California
-change someones life
Have a little faith and show the world who is bold.
Global Cafe, Jasper Place High School
And last but not least you’ll even be able to practise your French…. with us!
Feeling disappointed with myself? Yes.
4. The Market, in particular Lalaisap day market in Sathorn. It opens only Monday to Friday between 10 to 2 pm, it is the best bazaar/daymarket in the city, apparently “Lalaisap” in Thai means “whatever money you bring, you will spend it” well it is difficult not to do so, you can find everything in such a good price that you kinda want to buy them all. You can get fashion items, food, fresh fruits, sweets, flowers, anything really. I took Little Miss there quite often too, she loves to get the dok mai (flower), a jasmine garland, that she put on her wrist just like in this picture below
We then walked through the streets of SOHO before getting a cab to take our tired bodies back to the hotel. There we recharged with our $10 slice of New York cheesecake we had purchased the night before. After a little rest we then hit the streets again for our last night in town. I attempted some souvenir shopping before we grabbed some dinner of yes, pizza, before calling it a night.
when was it that you decided to start your own business? As much as I love being mum (and my children will always be number one) I needed something that was for just me – AdminAide was born 6.5 yrs ago and my newest venture Phoenix Trading December 2011.
Roger that... Uh, we are stable...
he told me, his eyes glistening, 'You'll never have to
the way we chuckle
I want nothing to do with your life and your decisions.
Frequent bouts of constipation and/or diarrhea can be a warning sign/symptom of a number of conditions, such as IBS (Irritable Bowel Syndrome) and Celiac Disease. If diarrhea lasts for more than a week, it can cause an electrolyte imbalance due to all the potassium and sodium loss. If not treated properly, that imbalance can lead to death. Listen to your poop and see your general practitioner if any of the above is the case.
This Sunday, I woke up at 7:00am to catch a flight to New York City from Chicago. Not only did I wake up anxious to begin my new journey in the Big Apple, I also woke up without a voice.
I have an assignment in “Typologies”. If you do not know what it means I have an explanation from the readings my tutor gave me: ” A typology, simply put, is a collection of members of a common class or type. It could be a grouping of physiognomic types, vernacular buildings, or species of monkeys. A typology is assembled by observation, collection, naming and grouping.”
Here’s the trailer:
To execute on them the judgment written;
It's a traditional Sunday roast tonight at the firefoodie household so I visited my favourite farm shop on the way home from Luca's rugby match. Foxbury Farm, near Burford in Oxfordshire, one of the best local farm shops around here. We had already decided on pork so I chose a portion of boned shoulder and had the butcher score the skin nicely so we would have loads of delicious crackling. The fresh produce section had some lovely locally grown brussels sprouts, our first dose of brussels for the year. It was here that I also found some great local streaky bacon.
Now then, let's count up all the ways Progresso reaffirmed my devotion to Campbell's Chunky in a mere 15 seconds.
--Conrad Richter.
"Umm ok, were you ever going to call and let me know? Do you realize I have a family of eight and we've been working without a refrigerator for a week?""
“We have been to Washington, D.C., Mount Vernon, Annapolis, Md., and Ocean City, Del.”
Anglada talks again with AD, the reference newspaper for the ever-increasing number of Catalan identitarians. He is relaxed, hesitation-free, and aware of his enormous responsibility regarding the future of Catalonia. Josep Anglada know that many people are interested in silencing him. He knows he will remain under heavy criticism from the fiercely mainstream press, and that the harsh verbal attacks against him will only intensify as the political expectations of PxC continue to grow.
Upland Teddy Bear Kisses 10.2%
Christmas - already!! But Halloween isn't even here yet. And... hel-LO!... Let's don't overlook Thanksgiving.
and trying to find time to breathe.
We have made a snuggily Book Nook for our girls.
Follow the trails through scenic farmland‚ enjoy exciting and unique artwork created by professional‚ new and up and coming local artists. Easter Anguston Farm has a strong green ethos reflected in the artwork. Sensible footwear advised!
This crazy mash up of a night encompasses all things cabaret, stand up and poetry. Wow. And will, allegedly, expose our ‘defections, procreations and procrastinations’. Oo er. So if you fancy sounding a bit pretentious, feeling a bit cultured, and have the guts to check out what could go catastrophically wrong or beautifully right… pop down!
The original epiphany is unimportant to the world at large, but the second mini-epiphany (epiphany aftershock?) was that I do my best thinking while driving. I thought back to a posting at Chookooloonks on meditation a few weeks back about meditation. For me, photography is very much like meditation. As Karen noted, the act of considering my subject, my settings, my intention is an act of meditation for me. And when I drive, I think. I compose. I ponder. I’ve written the best letters, stories and, yes, blog entries, while on the open road, only to lose them like dreams when I reach my destination.
Strength radiates from every freckled pore as you let slip reality.
Beats a Horror Horn, I guess.
Conservative economic thinking was also behind the decision made to freeze the national minimum wage for under 21s as of October. The last thing the government wants to do is to impede job creation by making employers pay too much for their young labour. Interestingly, this decision was announced by Liberal Democrat Vince Cable, proving that, even as a Coalition, the Government is not afraid to lean to the economic right.
A country free of discrimination; a country free of violence; a country free of hate. The Obama Administration could ask no better partner than the Anti-Defamation League as we jointly strive to attain the ideals of equal opportunity, equal rights, and equal justice for all. Members of the ADL - I salute you."
Tim Wallach
Copy editor: Lindsay Naylor
There was no sign of Dublin’s most expensive spoons at the cash desk as we queued for our fix. What would they look like, we wondered? Then we spotted them – well out of reach of spoon thieves – behind the counter.
-The Frank Lloyd Wright Home and Studio in Oak Park (the benefit was 2-for-1 tickets)
Flexion means you will bend an arm or knee. (Example: showing off the biceps muscle; sitting in a chair with the knees bent.)
Many tout the Apple iPod to be the mother of all MP3 players. Here is a quick review of the latest generation of iPod Classic (7th generation) and take a closer look at the new and improved features that comes with it.
Today I am heading to my friend Narda's house for our mini scrappy retreat. She has her house all to herself this weekend and she invited me to come over and scrap. I of course said yes!
In an open letter, he says he has met with the black and ethnic minority to discuss the situation and the effect it might have on their community.
McLachlan
Another pinwheel (or are they called rosettes?) - anyway, I love making them. They are the perfect way to use those strips that are cut off the edge of a piece of 6" x 6" paper to make the background layer for my cards, those strips I can never bear to throw away. I have oodles of them and at last can put them to some use!!!
When its done,switch off and cool down.
When did Bridge and Tunnel start and how did it begin? Why did you choose the band name Bridge and Tunnel?
They have no doubt done the calculations and worked out that they could recoup their initial investment by buying £1000 worth of beer off the BrewDog website, or two grands worth over the counter in their bars. For some, that will look quite an attractive proposition. Indeed, I know one of the original shareholders who parted with £230 in the first Equity share release just under two years ago and he has recouped his original investment in discount obtained from purchases off the website. He had to keep buying, though, but he says that he would have bought the beers anyway.
When the headquarters of secret U.S. spy agency CONTROL is attacked and the identities of its agents compromised, the Chief (Alan Arkin) has no choice but to promote his ever-eager analyst Maxwell Smart, who has always dreamt of working in the field alongside his idol, stalwart superstar Agent 23 (Dwayne Johnson). Smart is partnered instead with the only other agent whose identity has not been compromised: the lovely-but-lethal veteran Agent 99 (Anne Hathaway).
I then submitted it to one of Paper Crafts magazine calls, but it wasn't chosen for that either.
Our brains, like our muscles, need to be "exercised" in order to remain healthy. The more one watches TV, the less exercise our brains get. Just as lack of physical exercise is known to lead to countless health issues as we get older, lack of mental exercise has been linked to an increased likelihood of being diagnosed with ADHD and other attention disorders, as well as dementia and Alzheimers later in life. (Not to mention the physical risks of heart disease, stroke, and cancer that result from too much sedentary time in front of the boob tube.)
- He LOVES his jumperoo! This is THE. BEST. toy he can have right now. The boy LOVES to move and this thing lets him do that. He goes crazy in this thing and jumps hard; so much so that you think it is going to break.
In a statement that I'm sure will shock and amaze you, a statement that will cause your mouth to gape open only slightly less wide than Paris Hilton's mouth would at the sight of a thousand erect penises, Fuckle is a bit awkward at school.
Anyway, a friend gave him a Leinie sampler 12-pack, and he wanted to share the wealth. I thanked him, and left the four beers in the garage to chill. Last night I pulled out the Fireside Nut Brown and popped it. Whoa! Now I know what the "Natural flavor added" bit on the label means: they put hazelnut essence in here. That's going to make it hard for me to like this one, I just don't like hazelnuts, except for out of hand eating and in pastries. Not in coffee, not in beer. Not this one, not Rogue, not whatever. I liked the pecans in the Shiner Holiday Cheer, but hazelnut...yeesh.
The octopus was well cooked. The sauce itself was more BBQ than black pepper caramel, but whatever. It was spicy and generally enjoyable.
Does he notice? Or has he come to expect that, since moving to Britain, random strangers will inhale deeply behind his back?
Brent, I have to say, your questions were deeply thought provoking for me. Answering each question was an experience. It is obvious from these questions that bullying is also close to your heart. I truly appreciate you giving me the venue to share my thoughts on the subject. It was an honor.
FAVORITE QUOTE: "Away! Away with you and your infernal 'Merry Christmas'!"
Loveyameanitseeyouin2012.
Men's 5000 - Bekele easy in 12:56.24 for the world lead. Top 6 under 13 minutes. Makes sub 13 look like a walk in the park.
“Accordingly we, all of the members of the Democratic caucus, while committed to working with you where appropriate, we cannot and will not consider any bonding proposal in the County of Nassau today, tomorrow or during our term, until a binding agreement is reached on independent, non-partisan redistricting that can be approved by a supermajority of the Legislature. Once we have that agreement and commence with an appropriate but expeditious process, we assure you that we will begin a fair assessment of responsible bonding requests.”
There we go with my lovely jumpsuit pattern – for which I am going to have to acquire some sort of silicone sticky bra that resists gravitation and stays on with sheer will power or neglect wearing any bra all together:
Friend: Are you seriously drunk? (Because I don’t normally drink)
I had just decided to construct panels for the front to enclose it for the winter, when Diane sent me a copy of the 1912 book Open Air Poultry Houses for All Climates. Because she’s awesome like that.
Keep scrolling for design tips and tricks for creating a similar card set of your own!
comprehensive package.
Caprylic Acid – A liquid fatty acid from cow’s or goat’s milk. Also from palm and coconut oil, other plant oils. In perfumes, soaps. Derivatives: Caprylic Triglyceride, Caprylamine Oxide, Capryl Betaine. Alternatives: plant sources.
-”I thought you give up on me.”
This tote is full of odds and ends that I can't bear to throw out as I might use the stuff someday. (Who am I kidding?) It also has a jumble of cross stitch thread that I just threw in there when we moved. I organized the thread this afternoon. Just have to stuff in the right spots of my floss boxes.
Row 2-14- ch1, turn, sc in each. Do not cut @ the end of row 14
Police Arrest 2 Cops For Keeping Confiscated Drugs
Slowly he moved forward
Often the way we see ourselves is not the way others see us, and our personality traits we know we have are not the ones that others see at all.
West Virginia really is a unique place to live. It’s elevation and geographical location allows it to be the home for many different plants and animals. Birding in particular is a lot of in West Virginia. Getting up in the early morning, feeling that fresh mountain air on your face and listening to the birds sing is a really great way to start any day. If you are going to go birding in West Virginia, there are some birds that you definitely must see. After doing a little birding myself, these are my five favorite birds in West Virginia.
Sooner or later, sure. But if standard English is the language spoken in your home, I’m not persuaded students need to do a rigorous study of grammar every single year. And note that if you are studying a foreign language of any kind, then the kids are getting quite a lot of grammar education that way.
How do the Sadducees respond to the apostles’ popularity? How does God respond? Why does God intervene on behalf of his apostles? What is his purpose for them (relate this back to Acts 1:8)? Why do the Sadducees use less force the second time around? Who is truly in charge here?
PAUL: Also, I opposed the Community Reinvestment Act, as well as I had legislation in 10 years before the bust came to remove that line of credit to the Treasury.
Cheeky little scamps.
There is a lot of setup in this first episode and that’s one of the reasons I’m willing to give it the benefit of the doubt at this point. The second reason is that I really like this cast, with the unfortunate exception of its lead, and the third reason is my hope that writers Marieke Hardy and Kirsty Fisher have learnt from the mistakes of the first season. I wrapped up my review of the first season with “I’m sure 2012 will just offer up more droopy faced Alison Bell muttering her way through awkward conversations” and while Bell’s still playing a sad sack, there is less muttering so let’s take that as growth. While I’m doubtful the road ahead will be littered with laughs I’m going into this season hoping for improvement.
this affects older people too so bring your grannies and grandads too.
A memo from the Obama administration directs US government agencies to consider gay rights when making aid and asylum decisions.
In fact, a new study suggests that violence leaves long-term scars on children’s bodies – not just in bruises on the skin, but also altering their DNA, causing changes that are equivalent to seven to 10 years of premature aging.
Yeah, yeah, I could link you all the detailed steps to knit. But then you would search for a video on youtube. Way simpler if I just link you this awesome youtube link
Negative thinking is a gateway to a pity party and self serving purposes.
So here comes all the cards for this weeks challenge and we will all be very pleased if you join us for this challenge.
However, as you’ll see when you read the below – I’m not sure if I’ll *ever* finish playing Skyrim.
Punkin enjoyed our raindrop math. I can't remember where I got this printable from. But I wrote an addition problem in the clouds and had her use the end of a pencil eraser dipped in paint to make raindrops representing the math problem. Then, she counted how many raindrops in all and wrote the answer on the umbrella.
Can you think of a better house warming gift? I certainly can't. This quilt just oozes happiness.
I was incorrect.
For tonight’s dinner you can layer this pasta and sauce mixture in a baking dish with mozzarella cheese. First, crack a pastured egg into the pasta and combine. Next stir in some cooked spinach or broccoli rabe, add some shredded mozzarella or grated Parmesan. Stir to combine all. Top with more sauce, a sprinkle of Panko if you have it and more shredded cheese. Bake at 350 degrees for 20 – 30 minutes, depending on the size of your pan. Keep an eye on it. When the cheese on top is browned and bubbly, it’s ready to come out! Enjoy tonight’s comforting dinner while resting easy knowing you’ve got ready-to-eat, homemade meals in the freezer. Who says saving up for a rainy day is hard to do? You’ve got this covered.
And weeping, turned, chose to forego
South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut (Trey Parker & Matt Stone and Pam Brady)
For $35 you can buy two PLEX which you can then sell to people in-game for somewhere between 250 and 400 million ISK. (Planning and patience can be worth 150 million ISK!) You get your ISK, another player gets 30 more days of play time without laying out any cash, everybody is happy.
I did not get any pictures of the actual battle. The smoke was too thick to see thru. Surprisingly all the cannons firing and the shotgun blasts did not bother Livie at all. This is her first year actually paying attention to the battle. She kept asking me which horsie was winning the race. The boys spent the battle looking for "dead" soldiers who would move or twitch while they were supposed to be dead on the ground.
His second point concerned the "God" research that I mentioned. He commented quite reasonably that the outcome you get would depend on the concept of God involved. That the usual Christian concept of God as a God of Love might have been behind the finding I mentioned -- that thinking about God makes you more altruistic -- he did not address, however. He preferred abstract argument to research results. But it is consistent with his argument that the usual Christian view of God makes Christians better people. How embarrassing for him!
How many in the last 12 months
I discovered the gem that is Marvell Rep by complete accident. Last week I went to a BU Alumni event – which happened to be a night at the theatre. We were invited to watch Marvell Rep’s production of The Threepenny Opera, which completely exceeded my expectations. It’s been a while since seeing a show produced feelings of sheer joy and total submergence in the world of the play.
Breakfast: English muffin with pb (1 starch and 1 protein)
I'm a gambler by nature. I am not risk averse. I am ready for the consequences. I have accepted responsibility. It would be nice to have a couple of billion companions in the fight, but that does not look likely. They hate boat-rockers, and most don't like to rock the boat. The path of least resistance is always an easier path for people to take, so guess what? They take it. They will use incredible excuses/reasons to carry on down that road until they are grey and withered, because, after all, it has worked for billions before them.
and ofcourse my chippy smiley's and animal shaped nuggets that are actually jus brought for the forever hungry me.....
It looks much better than it did before though. I'm happy it's not screaming out "hey, look at me, I don't match". Because that, my friends, was getting annoying.
Lt. General Robert G. Gard, Jr., USA (Ret.)
When we first started going abroad as a family in 2005, we agreed that we wouldn't go to the same place twice, but that went to pot when we fell in love with Zakynthos. It's an amazingly green island - it rains almost all winter - and the people are like none that I've met anywhere else. They are naturally warm, can't do enough for you and genuinely value the holidaymakers. There is little in the way of work on the island apart from farming olives, raisins or wine-making, so the bulk of people's income is made during the holiday season. Sadly, the wonderful restaurants are making less and less every year - and I'm sure it's the same all over - as 'all inclusive' holidays become more popular. I can see the financial reasons for an all inclusive holiday, but a huge part of the experience for us is deciding where to eat each night and the pleasure of being recognised and greeted like old friends (year in, year out) by the restaurant staff.
At the same time, I’m beginning to plan the book – its thrust – the ideas I want to explore, the tough issues, the conflicts that drive it along – the characters, possible scenes, details… Ah! You know how it is. I do some of this work on giant spread sheets, but most on handwritten A4 sheets that soon build into piles. So, for my last book: Viking Women, Boat-building, Names, Merchandise, Weaponsmiths, Jewellery, Ladoga, Harald Sigurdsson, Rus, Black Sea, and so forth. Before long, these piles become tottering edifices.
I have a Bachelor of Arts in Communication with a minor in Writing from The University of Tampa. I am the former Arts and Entertainment Editor of The Minaret (The University of Tampa's student run newspaper). I created a newsletter for the College of Arts and Letters of The University of Tampa. I spent a summer writing for an online magazine, 83 Degrees, as the Job News Editor.
She was tall and beautiful with long brown wavy hair and dark blue eyes. There she stood under the big clock at the Hotel Astor in Manhattan. “Hey gorgeous, how about a movie tonight?” The young woman smiled as she glanced back up at the clock. It was five minutes to six and her date would be there any minute. His name was Ray Ravelli, and he was a professional boxer. Tonight there would be a lot of stopping on the way to dinner, because everyone knew Ray when he walked through Times Square. As the clock struck six and the bells gently tolled, she saw Ray walking towards her.
I have always been in awe of friends and family who deemed themselves “lucky” because they are from all different walks of life. For some, it’s obvious to notice their good fortune as they have beautiful homes, great careers, fancy cars – for many of us, they are living the dream. Honestly, who wouldn’t say they were lucky?
Yes, my limerick is lazy. I don’t feel like fixing it.
The GM David Allan will lead the team!
The goal was followed by a relatively even spell. Arsenal was dominating possession, but our only shot up to this point had been van Persie’s free-kick. What was noticeable was the amount of times Arsenal and QPR players were slipping, especially around Paddy Kenny’s area. It was an ominous sign of things to come.
As for meaning, like most of our species, we attempted to do things that made us feel good or made others feel good about us, which is the same thing. And in the end, I have spawned enough offspring to carry my name, but not necessarily my memory unless I did something particularly memorable, which is still to be determined.
Let’s break the silence and put an end to abuse.
William Elliot is a cousin of heroine Anne Elliot and the heir presumptive of her father, Sir Walter. He became etranged from the family when he wed a woman of much lower social rank, for her fortune. Sir Walter and Elizabeth had hoped William would marry the latter. After becoming a widower, he mended his relationship with the Elliots and attempted to court Anne in the hopes of inheriting the Elliot baronetcy and ensuring that Sir Walter never marries Mrs. Penelope Clay, Elizabeth Elliot’s companion. He was an interesting character, but his agenda regarding Sir Walter’s title and estates struck me as irrelevant. Sir Walter could have easily found another woman to marry and conceive a male heir.“PERSUASION” could have been a better story without a rogue/villain. Here are the actors that portrayed William Elliot:
serves 1-4
Jimmy Knepper: Trombone
The South African constitution is nothing but a license to genocide of whites in South Africa. If the ruling party, their courts and their supporters decide that it is in “public interest” to take away the mines, the land, the businesses the cars and all property whites own, then they will. It is their ultimate aim.
Have a great weekend. And, don’t hold your breath for a blue bedroom grand reveal on Monday. You know I could have these swatches on my wall until Summer.
I apologize for the all-caps paragraph, but it’s the only way I know how to get across the way the guy was yelling at me at the top of his voice in surprise. As I mentioned before, Jonathan is a celebrity in Thialf, and even though my new friend knew that speedskating was not a major sport in America (given his initial surprise that I was even there) he somehow thought, I guess, that the top American skaters might still be given some sort of sports-star perks anyway. (Traveling-companion tickets, maybe? I’d go for that!)
DCS Williams could not tell the court how many phones had been hacked or how many voicemails accessed.
VG: Great - I shall look forward to that. Thanks for visiting, Tim, and for putting up with my rambly unfocussed questions - it just goes to show how slippery this thing called poetry is. And we never got round to philosophy or themes of loss - such is conversation. It takes its own shape.
09 Young, Gifted and Skint
One can truly think of him as having spread and enjoyed good cheer from coast to coast. And how to sum him up, now that he is gone? Noel Coward has a little-known play called This Was a Man. Of Howard it can be said: This was a mensch.
Here's another card I made using papers and peel off Dazzles by Hot off the Press. I used a bunch of the extra papers and stickers to make this card. I used a Fiskars border punch on the blue paper and added a ribbon accent. My final touch was to outline the edge of the card with coordinating blue chalk ink.
The MetCon was DIANE! OH DIANE! Diane consists of Dead Lifts and HSPUs (Handstand Push Ups) for 21, 15, 9. For y’all new to CrossFit or unaware of CrossFit that means do 21 dead lifts, 21 hspus, 15 dead lifts, 15 hspus, 9 dead lifts and 9 hspus. YAY FUN! Right?!? Hello? Who’s with me here?
*Tools: Spellbinders Nestabilities; Big Shot
In all of this, it is important to know how to keep score because it is usually how you know how close you are to your goal.
cooking (even less)
Team Adam was next. He gave Katrina Parker 40 points and Tony Lucca 60 points. He insisted that this didn’t mean he thinks Tony is better; it’s just that he has a better connection with him he wants to see through. I thought that was kind of strange. First, I feel like at this point he shouldn’t really determine his score by who he’s better friends with. He was also talking like his score ensured that Tony was staying and Katrina was leaving. At that point, America could have still saved Katrina. That wasn’t the case, though – Katrina received 92 points and Tony received 108 points, advancing him to the finals.
There's another way of putting it. The money flowing into British universities was both evidence of, and contributed to, the maintenance of the fiction that this country really mattered in the region. British influence has been based largely on personal links with rulers who, however unattractive and undemocratic, often suffer from a misty-eyed Anglophilia that leads them to want to fund our universities, buy Premiership football clubs or national icons such as Harrods. We will miss them when they're gone.
PS how is my baby 8 months already?
I hope to get at least the 2 red sweatshirts made into pillows as they would match my futon nicely!
President Obama honored and thanked those Freedom Riders this past week for their courage and dedication 50 years ago. In his Cairo speech in 2009, he appeared to encourage similar initiatives of Palestinian nonviolence. Obama has an opportunity now to send a powerful message to the world by voicing strong support for the efforts of Palestinian Freedom Riders challenging segregation and daily discrimination rather than maintaining the silence he has kept since 2009.
Black Hawk helicopters (possibly taking off from disused Soviet air
Seasonal surge disorder. I think I have it. In fact, I’d go as far as to say that most people in fashion suffer from this unofficial condition. Let me explain. It’s technically spring but it still feels like winter. Floral crop tops and ditsy tea dresses cavort wantonly in window displays despite it being too cold to wear them. Although international designers are currently previewing autumn winter designs, I’ll be damned if I can find a cosy jumper on the high street. To cap it all off, every other press release that finds its way into my inbox is telling me it’s Easter. Go figure.
Helms finds odd medicine bundles stuffed in her overheating vehicle and under her residence and believes people are trying to “witch” her for some of the stories she wrote and her activities on the reservation. The medicine men help her recover from the witching and she knows now not to touch the bundles. “That's the 'black witchcraft' mother warned me about,” she writes.
Oh, yeah. I also blame director Frank Tuttle for not reining Ladd in during that final half. The first half of the movie had shown he was capable, but something happened in the middle. That change in the character could never be good, but it would have been better if Ladd hadn't suddenly changed his approach to the character. I think I might have gotten whiplash from that quick turn-around.
The Times, 05/02/2012
Inori, noting that Shu is on the ground floor, jumps off the top of the building to get to him.
What started out as girls' games became a witch hunt. Wicked Girls is a fictionalized account of the Salem witch trials told from the perspectives of three of the real young women living in Salem in 1692.
October 8 - David Hess, actor ("The Last House on the Left") and songwriter ("Speedy Gonzalez"), 69
Lashed, slapped and kicked women have been for embalming a curse in the family by delivering but boys, torched at times, just because the husband was incapable of producing a sperm carrying an y chromosome. And that bastard, son of a bitch, after screwing his so called wife just stands and watches his MOTHER do the bashing, and at times, joins her. There are times I wish the torture devices in Saw really existed. I’d love to cut such people up too.
I hope I’m not boring anyone with my haul posts.. If you’re tired of seeing haul posts, do let me know and I’ll try to slip in some actual review posts here and there =) But I’m definitely not done with my Korean haul posts, so do bear with me just a bit more =)
A wise person will be mature enough to understand that everything, and I mean everything has a SOURCE. That’s why there is a cause and effect law.
We haven't had a picture of Max lately, and by the looks of the photo above he was not having any part of the camera. He is sensitive to the paparazzi, so I had to be patient and take probably another 20 pictures before he would look at me. And by the look he is giving me in this picture he was not that happy with my camera wielding behavior.
Now, back at our new home we are continuing our efforts to eat lots of greens. We are trying to get at least one big serving of greens at dinner each night, but this can quickly become boring . So I have been keeping an eye out for different way to prepare collard greens, kale, chard and spinach. I was pleased to find a recipe for Kale Saag over at Not Eating Out in New York. It looked like a great new way to make kale. We simplified her recipe just a little bit because we are all about easy these days. It has great flavor. Kale can be tough and chewy, but this recipe blends it into a smooth texture. (I was toying with the idea of calling it Kale Mush for Grown-Ups, but decided that might not be a hit.) This recipe is vegan, but it would be good made with some chicken stock added instead of the cooking water, or some cream at the end.
We always tried to be safe, to be healthy, and still, he got sick. A mutual acquaintance said to me, “How could he have let himself get sick like that?” What??!! As if he chose to get cancer. Sheesh. A woman at the grief group mentioned that this county has a higher than normal rate of cancer. Could that have been a factor? Even if it is, it doesn’t change anything.
I’m sure when(if)ever I’m in another romantic relationship that I will bring a fair amount of screwed-up-ness to the party, so I’m trying to lessen that in this in-between time. That means that I watch and learn and try to do the best I can to avoid learning some lessons the hard way.
We were only submitted to Embassy two weeks prior. I was in shock. I walked out to the living room where Ben was already sitting and showed him the email on my phone. Still in disbelief. He confirmed that what I was reading was actually real.
Q063) Do you have any agreements or rules within 2NE1?
This isn’t really a poem, of course. The “problems” are actual problems that arise in the Produce Department at the food coop where I volunteer. The solutions are just silly.
Like the rest of the rooms in the house, we mainly used things Diane (the homeowner and property manager) already had.
The 3rd issue we thought we were dealing with was egg eating. It is apparently difficult to stop and we happen to like eating those eggs so we were a little concerned.
So the question is..
called Habitat
from the collection of Darling & Company!)
05. Reconsider Baby - 4:54
After the meeting, a newfound friend approached me and said, “If you really want to bake Christmas cookies, I have a wonderful kitchen with a big island that’s great for making cookies. You are welcome to come over any time and bake as much as you want.”
“Let the habitation of them become forsaken” (ver. 26). This is now evident. For in the same manner as He hath mentioned not only a secret deliverance of His, saying, “Give heed to My soul, and redeem her;” but also one open after the body, adding, “because of mine enemies deliver me:” so also to these men He foretelleth how there are to be certain secret misfortunes, whereof a little before He was speaking. …For the blindness of the Jews was secret vengeance: but the open was what? “Let their habitation become forsaken, and in their tabernacles let there not be any one to inhabit.” There hath come to pass this thing in the very city Jerusalem, wherein they thought themselves mighty in crying against the Son of God, “Crucify, Crucify;” and in prevailing because they were able to kill Him that raised dead men. How mighty to themselves, how great, they seemed! There followed afterwards the vengeance of the Lord, stormed was the city, utterly conquered the Jews, slain were I know not how many thousands of men. No one of the Jews is permitted to come thither now: where they were able to cry against the Lord, there by the Lord they are not permitted to dwell. They have lost the place of their fury: and O that even now they would know the place of their rest! What profit to them was Caiaphas in saying, “If we shall have let go this man thus, there will come the Romans, and take away from us both place and kingdom”? Behold, both they did not let Him go alive, and He liveth: and there have come the Romans, and have taken from them both place and kingdom. But now we heard, when the Gospel was being read, “Jerusalem, Jerusalem, how often would I have gathered together thy sons, as a hen her chickens under her wings, and thou wouldest not? Behold there is left to you your house forsaken.” …
First of all, I have to point out the flashing Zutter's logo on the right... Jennifer made it for the blog hop and gave instructions on how to put it on the blog - and make it flash and by jove, I managed to follow them and it does!!
I worked up a sample using some scrap yarn and knitted him a scarf. C.B. (stands for "church bazaar" ;-) ) is a very easy project - worked entirely in garter stitch - and a fun way to dip your toe into toy knitting. The only thing that can be considered evenly slightly tricky is the sewing up, but even that's not too bad. Flat Bear would also be an ideal project for new knitters - especially young ones - given how quick the project is.
RR—There’s actually a wide range of behaviors that thing has. There’s two really strong reactions that people have. One is just a sense of wonder at it, and the other is just abject terror.
“Seth.” His father shook him roughly and hissed, “Seth, they’re here!”
The government’s handling of the Bersih sit-in protest at Kuala Lumpur shows its ‘authoritarian’ nature, according to an Australian Senator who is here as an election observer.
Even while it is standing still in Japan.
If you would know the answer to that question, read The Comrades! But meanwhile, you may watch the trailer:
In a question-and-answer session following her speech at Harding University here, Rice said she would not be Mitt Romney’s running mate. “Thank you for that enthusiastic response, but no,” she said. This will dispel all those Condi Veep Rumors! Until the next ones!
Woke up this morning to learn about the deaths of Farrah and Michael
05. Into the Cave (02:53)
It gave me a new perspective and filled me with hope knowing that what often feels like endless planning, preparation, grocery shopping, keeping up with the laundry, wiping down toilet seats and scrubbing toothpaste spittle can have great effect in God’s kingdom.
Only I saw Narian for who he truly was: a young man with courage and an independent mind, and made to pay for what was outside his control. He couldn't help his past any more than he could help the way those intense, deep-blue eyes pierced me and held me captive.
I can never say it enough, but THANK YOU to all of you who have been there for me/us through the years. It’s with your love, support and encouragement that we have gotten to where we are now, and for that we are EXTREMELY grateful.
"From one dream into the next..."
We loved every bit of it!
The garden will also help commemorate the 165th anniversary of the publication of Wuthering Heights, Jane Eyre and Agnes Grey, all of which appeared in print in 1847.
That's it right there.
Me: Your aunt. Let’s end it already. It’s been years. Let’s make up. I’ll buy you coffee one of these days. By the way, you’re beginning to sound like your hideous mother.
Back to the pizza… I made the Roman pizza dough that has come to be my favorite recipe. The recipe calls for the dough to be divided into 6 equal portions, but tonight out of sheer absent mindedness I divided it into 4. Turned out perfectly, since my new peel is bigger than my old one. I rolled the dough nice and thin, then dusted the peel with a little flour and built my pie.
the very story that he narrated in this conversation, also takes us back to what the sociologists call, “lived religion.” We can go back as Jimmy Carter tells his story to a young boy in a local church, a rural church in a deep southern state, the state of Georgia. A Southern Baptist church, where he did indeed develop a great love for the Bible. But as the twists and turns of this Bible become very apparent to us, Mr. Carter also came to an understanding of the scripture in the terms of its authority and inspiration that was well, at odds with where the church had historically affirmed those very truths. For instance, it’s clear that Mr. Carter holds to what in the twentieth century would be defined as a new orthodox understanding of scripture. When he speaks of the scripture containing truth, and when he clearly speaks of the event of reading the scripture as being an act of revelation, he is speaking the kind of language that was associated with Carl Barth and so many others. There were many complimentary things that the new orthodox said about scripture. But they did not affirm that every single word of scripture was verbally inspired, something that scripture claims of itself. Mr. Carter, in the midst of this conversation, made some very interesting statements. For instance he said that as a scientist trained as a nuclear physicists, there were some things in the Bible that the writers of the Bible just didn’t understand. He said, “I just ignored these discrepancies as insignificant.” In other words, he holds that the authors of scripture were not only inspired by God and the Holy Spirit in some sense, but they were also trapped within their own systems of meaning. Now, that is a different understanding of inspiration than what we have held that there is very clearly a divine inspiration that means that the Holy Spirit guards the human authors of scripture from all error. That is a crucial distinction. But it has to do with the question also, as Mr. Carter intimated, that it was the men who were inspired more than the words who were inspired. Now, when you start to look at that you realize that the product of divine inspiration is there very much at stake. Mr. Carter teaches the scripture with enthusiasm. When he holds it in his hand, he refers to it as the Word of God. But as he made clear in this conversation, he does not believe that is a word that is in terms of plenary verbal inspiration, true in every one of its words. But he also believes greatly what is found in the Bible. He says, for instance, that he does affirm that miracles of the Bible. I was very encouraged by his very bold affirmation of believing in the virgin birth and in other super natural events recorded in the Scripture. But then he makes the odd statement that if those things were not true, his faith in Christ would still be intact. That is a separation of history and theology that I believe is destructive of the gospel. The gospel is predicated upon certain historical events, without which, there is no gospel. Jesus Christ is not who scripture reveals Him to be. Now, that leads to other aspects of the conversation that were truly revealing having to do with how President Carter deals with issues of human sexuality and sexual ethics. Very candidly, and even courageously, given his own intellectual integrity, he spoke of his selectivity when it comes to those passages. Now, we need to be very honest and say that sometimes, evangelicals who hold to the inerrancy of scripture are inconsistent and often selective where we ought not to be. But that means that we need to check ourselves against that kind of selectivity and make certain that we are employing a hermeneutic that is consistent with our understanding of the inerrancy and infallibility of the Word of
I will only act in romance drama after I know more about love.For now, I’m still lacking in experience.
* 1 package jalapeno cheddar tortillas (I used jalapeno cilantro flavor)
You grow a garden; you expect to be able to harvest the food from that garden and eat it. You raise a cow; you expect to be able to milk that cow and consume the milk. You raise chickens; you expect to gather eggs and eat them. It’s uncomplicated, simple, a fundamental right. Perhaps you wouldn’t feel this way if you lived under some other form of government, but here, now, in America and other democratized countries, this is what you expect.
Is it better to know the Lord or to be known of the Lord? The quick answer to this question is from Galatians 4:9.
Flo IPA Cask (Trinity). Naturally carbonated and served through a hand pump. This cask was dry hopped with wild Colorado hops and aged on French oak. Brewer, Jason Yester.
One of the real things about blondes is that we are very fair skinned. And now that we know all about using sunscreen, I look white as a ghost. No more healthy looking tan fit body for me. After five kids and an exteme allergy to exercise, the body looks a little flabby.
At first I was horrified when I saw the size of the book, and I quickly decided that it was definitely one to be read at home and not on my commute into town! When I picked up the book to start reading I was quite relieved to see that it was two complete book in one!
I am sorry, but are you fucking kidding me? DID YOUR PARENTS NOT TEACH YOU TO NOT GET INTO CARS WITH STRANGERS?!! I don’t fucking care if my friends are all getting in with him, whether I’m 19 or 27, I never thoughtlessly decide to get into a damn vehicle with a stranger and trust their skills.
To rape and kill your dumbest.
Even for those who are pro a woman’s choice, may find this disrespectful use of human remains challenging.
the 90 minute tech support phone call with a very sweet lady ended in...
The bridesmaid sticker set is damaged. It's just the letters though so I think you'll still be able to get some use out of it. :0)
As I'm sure most bloggers are doing I'm evaluating the last year of my life and making resolutions for the new year. I've decided to not reflect on the past and look to the future.
My point is that even if a new Melville or Twain, Faulkner or Fitzgerald were to appear in our midst, his work would fail to achieve the critical traction and existential weight of those earlier masters. We lack the requisite community of readers, and the ambient shared cultural assumptions, to provide what we might call the responsorial friction that underwrites the traction of publicly acknowledged significance. The novel in its highest forms requires a certain level of cultural definiteness and identity against which it can perform its magic. The diffusion or dispersion of culture brings with it a diffusion of manners and erosion of shared moral assumptions.
16-year-old Callie lost her parents when the ‘genocide spore’ wiped out everyone except those who were vaccinated first – the very young and very old. She and her little brother must go on the run, living as squatters, fighting off unclaimed renegades who would kill for a cookie. Hope comes in the form of the Body Bank run by a mysterious figure, known only as The Old Man. The Body Bank allows teenagers to rent out their bodies to ‘Enders’ – the elderly members of society – who want to be young again. But Callie discovers that her renter intends to do more than party in her body. She intends to commit murder…
While the entire nation, including superstars Amitabh Bachchan and Rajinikanth, is hooked to Dhanush's Kolaveri Di, lyricist Javed Akhtar has slammed the song.
A gift is something given freely and without strings attached. It's something you give because you want to give it. A giver of a gift does not expect anything in return. The giving of a gift is a happy transaction. If your gift is not like this, then it is not a gift at all. It is something else entirely.
eternally present to all who fear him,
The original volume was commissioned by Moses ben Yekuthiel Hakohen during a period when Italian Jews experienced exceptional scholarly and artistic activity as well as social mobility. The most elegantly and lavishly executed Hebrew manuscript of that era, it is comprised of more than 37 religious and secular works. Among the religious books are Psalms, Proverbs, and Job, and a yearly prayer book including the Passover Haggadah, while the secular books include philosophical, moralistic, and scientific treatises. The text throughout the manuscript is accompanied by marginal notes and commentaries. Of 948 pages, 816 are decorated in vibrant colors, gold and silver.
Sleepless Knight.
There has been a lot of problems with soldiers from Joint Base Lewis-McChord, where Staff Sgt. Robert Bales was based.
TANGY FRUIT SALAD
How to make :
"What did you do anyway?" I inquired, trying to keep myself contained.
Last Saturday, the very lovely Karen over at Karen's World, gave me a blog award. Karen is a good friend, please take a look over at her blog, she's a stamping up demonstrator, a fantastic mum, and is always posting fabulous things on both of her blogs.
if I could five you sapphires
Look at the nice, wide bike lane. Our mayor is doing a lot for biking. There are places downtown where they have reduced auto traffic to one lane and others where the entire street bears a green bike stripe. Spring is also clean up time, this neighborhood has a scheduled trash pickup thus providing us with a thousand chances for a flat tire. Thankfully the streets are quiet enough that you can give the trash a wide berth. We have ridden these roads for ten years now and we always wonder how basically the same people can produce so much junk. After turning left by the high school I am heading due west toward the river and the lake.
You don’t need a writing group. (That is my personal opinion and I will explain myself later.)
One of the reason for going to Sicily was to join an event organised by Aleksandar Markovic, founder of the Cigars and Professional Group on Linkedin (see here). The event name was already very appealing (the Luxury of Taste) and promised good food, drinks but above all, for me at least, cigars.
The pictures don't do this justice. It was really cute in person.
Posey’s grounder would have given the Giants the lead if Brooks Conrad was the Marlins second baseman.
I will post further information on this killing if I get it. This now means that, at least 3,108 white South African farmers have been murdered since the end of Apartheid.
or watch the news—
so green it seems
Come on a journey with me
Terence D. Gazzani, 24, New York, N.Y.
That killed the idea for me. I like to shop, but buying three spinning face brushes is excessive, even for me. But I bought a Mia, anyway, figuring I could review it here.
Something must be in the blogosphere air because three amazingly talented readers sent me three amazingly awesome jewelry storage ideas, all within a few days of one another. And because I was so spoiled with tons of eye candy, I get to give you boatloads of incredible inspiration when it comes to storing your precious gems. How lucky are we!?!
Gislen et al. 2003. Superior Underwater Vision in a Human Population of Sea Gypsies. Current Biology 13(10), 833-836.
-Woody Allen
Here’s his list of national powers: Alabama, Florida, Florida State, Miami, Michigan, Nebraska, Notre Dame, Ohio State, Oklahoma, Penn State, Tennessee*, Texas and USC. See that asterisk after Tennessee? The Vols were a “no-brainer” ten years ago, but have fallen off the map since then “a bit”. But they’re saved because of “Rocky Top”.
They're a mess. An adorable, fuzzy, sharks-mouthed mess.
Take for instance the idea of the steam punk sub-genre that is often associated with settings in the far past, such as the Victorian era, while containing visions of how the future would have been conceived. In some part of our mind, this combination makes sense: we can accept that there is some trigger of reality and thus we associate steam-punk with either setting. However, try to combine steam punk with a different genre or setting, say something like Middle Earth or anything with wizards and the world seems to implode on us. The concept of steam punk is limited to its conception in the late 1980s because it is mostly associated with history and oddly configured technology. We can see fantasy mix with steam punk in more of manga situations rather than in novels. Why? Because we cannot cross that comfortable line of what can be combined and what cannot, what is appropriate and what crosses the invisible boundary.
2. Glossy is coated so colors don't soak through. No checking how well you've done on the backside, sorry.
As many of you know, I am currently working toward ICEA certification as well as Breastfeeding Counselor certification. As part of this journey, I have met a lot of interesting people and read a lot of stuff. Yeah, stuff….articles, blogs, news, books…all on birthing babies, being pregnant with a baby, growing babies, feeding babies or something about babies. One of the things I did not expect to happen, it never even occurred to me to consider actually, was the amazing amount of diversity just in the beliefs and philosophies surrounding all things baby. I’ve had to come to the realization that, as an educator and advocate of moms, I’m going to have to start understanding and accepting things…maybe some that I don’t necessarily agree with…so that I can be an advocate and educator for amazing women.
A good memory I wish to keep. :-)
"The significance here lies in the very tiny rate of engagement across all brands in a big sample." Next time you get the "engagement" argument for social media, try not to get a hernia laughing.
Stephenson was Step-hen-son!
Heat oil in a non-stick pan...
Too calm: and I know in my mind
However in Singapore, the newcomers are “fast-tracked” to become PRs and citizens without first familiarizing themselves with the country first and spending adequate time to make the decision.
It shone, then dimmed and cut my heart’s cord.
Busy students...love that sight :) I had a great time meeting the students. Some I knew from past retreats *waves to the Reading girls* and others were new faces. All were equally welcoming and a great bunch of women x
I’m worried about the people who are living in a shelter. The sorrow and shock have veiled Japan. Hopefully the situation with lack of water and food will improve and more people will be able to get united with their missing families and friends. I hope that people who were hit hard by the earthquake will not give up their hope. Thank you for your continuous support.
Actually, I'm writing from my new laptop (birthday present, thanks Mum and Dad!), so I don't have any of my own photos uploaded yet! What I do have are photos from my sister's magical underwater camera - oooh ahhh.
"I'm fine." I say blushing "Just clumsy."
6. Business reputation and brand: IBM had never had a true Head of marketing and just like the processes and the 128 CIO scenario, marketing was controlled by countries and business units etc. That resulted in a totally disjointed marketing campaign. The new Head of marketing decided to consolidate all of IBM’s advertising relationships into a single ad agency. This spawned the “Solutions for a Small planet” and was followed by the coining of the term, “e-business.”
While myself and a lot of the other people ridiculed me on a daily basis on my team's performances, people who read my blog had no problem complimenting my writing and complimenting me as a father, and with it, I felt good about myself again.
I decided to make a couple small pizzas with Italian meats, provolone cheese, and other items I found in my fridge. For the crust, I used store-bought tandoori naan bread. They make the perfect individual pizza crusts.
before giving it to my Mum!
Nancy – 56 (25.81%)
Sarawak Report has already questioned a number of the links between some Tasmanian politicians and the Taib regime.
An imprisoned vampire, Barnabas Collins, is set free and returns to his ancestral home, where his dysfunctional descendants are in need of his protection.
So, yeah: Feminazis can FTFO. Susan B. Anthony would be ashamed of the lot of them.
How about stockings with glow in the dark webs on them?
Tracy Wolff is creative in the sense she does not out right tell you what is wrong with Rhiannon but lets it slowly unfold. This story is really about a woman’s emotional battle to let a man back into her life after three years of not being intimate with a man because of her rape.
Holmes was a brand manager in Topps's marketing department, and had been with the company since 1994. One former employee says Topps was "not the most diverse work environment," and as such, Holmes was the go-to when the art department needed a black guy. In 2008, he posed as "Wheelbarrow Walker," a fictional baseball player (what is with Topps and cards featuring nonexistent people?) and was happy to do it. He was told of the idea behind Wheelbarrow Walker, posed for the photoshoot, was shown the proofs before the card was printed, and signed off on them.
Dig deeper. Study a little harder. It will change your life just as it has change mine, i promise!
A Little Information About Me: I live with my four adult children, son-in-law, and four grandchildren. My son and son-in-law work in a paint store. I work as a house cleaner. In my free time I visit my friends who are sick and attend political meetings in my neighborhood.
Everyone else is posting about theirs... so I figured I might as well blog about mine, too. I had a great day. Woke up to the boys' card and the present from my daddy, which I posted pictures of on Sunday. But all the exciting things happened after my last entry.
When full-time job-time came around, positions were scarce and elementary schools weren't calling - middle schools were. In fact, I ignored 2-3 middle school calls before I finally answered the phone. That last phone call was from the school I work at now. In middle school I was worried that this would have to be my motto:
Lineamenta: The New Evangelization for the Transmission of the Christian Faith, n. 6:
Following this publication, the Department of Health will issue a series of policy statements including the final outcomes framework in the autumn.
Mix these together (could just pulse in a food processor until crumbly, no longer, you don't want it to form a ball.) Press this mixture into a jelly roll pan (15x10").
It's now the beautiful month of June
today long rails
I have a new card to show you tonight .. this I made for a Friend’s brithday.. Hope He likes it when he gets it!!
If you do decide to watch this movie then there are a few things you need to pay close attention to, first being the pop band Dessert. Their lyrics are translated for a reason so pay attention to the words. Also, with most Asian films there is not a need to explain every detail which means you need to pay close attention to the dynamics of the relationships between the characters…especially the families. Pay as much attention to what is say as what is NOT said. Still chances are this movie will leave you scratching your head over the meaning because it is a very deep and poetic movie that doesn’t lay out all the meanings for you in black and white. But in my opinion it is definitely a movie worth watching. I left a lot of details open and didn’t follow through with what happened to certain characters for a reason, it is something you need to see for yourself to appreciate how profound and groundbreaking this story is. And lastly, while your watching really be thinking about why people are committing suicide and the answer to the question “are you connected to yourself?”
The Anniversary Event:
16 Once
My uncle has a farm. He violates Lev. 19:19 by planting two different crops in the same field, as does his wife by wearing garments made of two different kinds of thread (cotton/polyester blend). He also tends to curse and blaspheme a lot. Is it really necessary that we go to all the trouble of getting the whole town together to stone them? – Lev.24:10-16. Couldn’t we just burn them to death at a private family affair like we do with people who sleep with their in-laws? (Lev. 20:14)
Christmas decorating begins early for the Ticos. The local warehouse store puts its lights, ornaments and trees up for sale in August. (No kidding!) Christmas candy starts showing up about this time as well. By mid-November a lot of families have their trees, wreaths made of cypress leaves and coffee berries, and soon there are sparkling lights twinkling across the valley at night. This year the new section of the mall has a terrific tree three stories high, and just yesterday I saw Santa outside the local supermarket dancing the salsa with a pretty brunette elf.
SHALOM! and STAY BLESSED! ~~I2AG~~(It’s all about God)!
Once we can answer this question better, and with one voice, the polls will rise.
You'd swap your broad mind for a narrow waist - Warwick.
You speak in a language unheard of
Images of ancient Aboriginal rock art can now be seen online with other great galleries of the world through Google’s Art Project and Griffith University.
"You're right. What should we have done?" I asked her.
HACHINOKI HONTEN (HACHINOKI ORIGINAL)
4) There are men that experience premature gray hair and the fight is too exhausting.
Although moments of “being still” can be frustrating, especially when special plans were changed, we should embrace those moments. Quiet moments to spend with God in prayer. One on one. So during your hectic week of non-stop errands, endless appointments, dueling deadlines, find a moment to be still and be blessed.
I'm still trying to figure out what I want to be when I 'grow-up'.... ya know, when the boys go to school in 3 years and I have nobody to look after full time. I have three years to figure it out.......
For by repeating o’er the Same again,
wicklie: folds
It will also be interesting to discover if this type of editing pattern is consistent across the slasher film genre, with the sequences featuring the ‘final girl’ and the killer edited much more quickly.
i feel weary and old.
But this assumes cost is only manufacturing cost. What about distribution through the supply chain as it makes its way to the supermarket shelf? It costs more to supply the shop farthest from your distribution depot than it does the one nearest. What about the cost base of the farmer producing the agricultural commodities? He is growing stuff based on last year’s commodity prices and will sell it at this years, at a loss if he has to, because if he doesn’t it gets ploughed into the ground and he gets no money back. He isn’t in business to make a loss but in a bad year minimising losses is better than losing everything.
You have empathy. Once a person can see beyond her desires and needs to what it will take to make her partner happy, she is well on her way to going from “me” to “we.” (I agree. In addition, believe this…no matter how powerful, successful, famous, popular of a woman you are…two traits you will have to learn are empathy and submission. If you rolled your eyes, at that statement….that’s why you are still single. If you are already married, and you still rolled your eyes….count your time, it will be short!)
I bought some red plastic cups at Walmart. I think they were like 4 for a dollar. I bought some random things that I put in the cups. I included some fun pencils, erasers, 3 dice,
Rendezvousing with Meryk back at the base, the party rested and coalesced a plan to attack the firebase from afar, making better use of the considerable range Cassandra and Meryk alike could bring to bear with their respective arsenals. In the meantime, Brother Vang experienced a disturbing vision of men in robes of blue and black traversing twisted and dizzying streets beneath a dark and terrible pall; the inheritor crusader shared this with his compatriots, declaring it a glimpse of Tsar itself–and soon enough the party made haste back to the firebase to besiege it.
Lieberman a man laboring, a labor man (union organizer?)
At the Penang Esplanade, Lim Guan Eng and his car came under attack, allegedly by Perkasa thugs. It was alleged the police stood by and watched the violence without taking action.
It has been a really rough year for me both emotionally and financially, but I do still have many things to be thankful for. I have an awesome husband and a beautiful daughter and I have my parents; I have my brother, his wife and my niece; I have my sister, her husband and my nephews and all of their extended families. And with the exception of my 2 nephews, we all live in or around the same city...so even with all of our family issues and excentricities, we are still a close family and I love them all.
Fresh or Frozen Parsley
As I look over my to-do list, I realize I am a tad-bit overwhelmed this month (with graduation and all of the events that go along with it). And so, I've decided to take a short break from blog posts for the remainder of May.
'Now yes. Earlier not so much. Thank you for caring..' I sleepily said.
MaXair....
For the time being I'll be filling out my Flickr profile with some of my better photos. A difficult task in some ways because I tend to get attached to a lot of the photos I make, for differing reasons. Nevertheless, now I need to select with a somewhat more critical eye I'm learning some new insights as well which I can use for the next shooting sessions. A lot of the photos I've made were quite good, but not quite good enough and it's hard work trying to find out why at times.
Wrong numbers and disrespectful telephone conversations, that’s what. When you have built-in address books and voice commands, remembering and dialing (or punching) actual numbers is a skill that shrivels like last week’s birthday balloon. And the terse nature of texting or Twitter makes a real phone conversation seem slow, awkward and painful.
There are a lot of costs that you can forgo if you enroll for an online PhD course. These include the overhead related to moving close to the educational institution and the living expenses that you have to burden yourself with.
This is being taken to the State Fair this Saturday for delivery to their Fine Art Competition. Here is the accompanying Artist Statement:
“Did we mention he was a cross-dresser?
At first I couldn't pinpoint why I was disappointed, I mean, Glen Keane did a great job speaking. But then I realized that a silly part of me thought that by listening to one of my art heroes speak, some of his awesomeness would rub off on me and I'd be magically transformed into a better artist. And another equally silly part of me thought I'd leave that lecture with some powerful art secret I never knew before. Ridiculous. I know.
I think this song it appropriate for today...
We talk a lot about the steadily increasing rates of autism diagnosis in the US, but we don't hear too much about the rest of the world. In this study, funded in part by Autism Speaks, researchers found a 2.6% incidence of autism in the Korean population.
In a nutshell: Icelandic design is a creative force that can strengthen Icelandic society and promote a diverse economy. All innovation projects call for the ingenuity and expertise of designers. It is important to involve designers in the early stages of projects, whether with private businesses, the public sector, or in different arenas. There is a prevailing tendency to get designers involved too late in the process, instead of bringing their experience into play at the very beginning of product and project development. There are already many interesting projects up and running that involve designers working with Icelandic heritage such as museums, agriculture, gastronomy, tourism and professional manufacturing. It is important to support these projects and to construct a network of designers, investors, business and marketing people, in order to create new and diverse opportunities in Iceland.
All 8 of ‘em have pissed me off - to the point of being over it all. Anyone that knows me - knows - when I’m done - I’m done.
Alright, before I leave you with the recipe, let me just share with you my experience with baking these tarts. I baked them in two batches, one on Monday & the other yesterday. I thought the pastry for the first batch was a bit too thick. Other than that, they were perfect. I only managed to take one picture of the first batch using my phone when it was just out of oven, before I left the house to run some errands. You may take a look at it on my Facebook Page. I also baked them at 200 deg C for about 25 minutes. For the second batch, the dough was a bit too thin so much so the custard for some shells seeped through even before I could put the tray into the oven. I also baked them at 200 deg C for the first 10 minutes & reduced it to 180 for the next 15 minutes. The tarts turned out to be more fragile than the ones from the first batch. A bit more baking time would be good... So the next time I make this tart, I'll make sure that I roll out the dough to a medium thickness & bake them at 200 dec C, just as recommended by Wendy. Do read Wendy's post where she shared some tips on the thickness of the shells.
To fragile to name
What's in it for you? Each child chosen to represent a specific month, will receive a free session and a free 8x10 print of your choice and a final 5x7 printed calendar. If your child is chosen for the cover image, you will recieve your choice of a new 2011 featured product! Stay tuned those will be released this week. I promise they are PERFECT for these types of session and you will be blown away by how fun the choices are.
Reader’s Choice Poll!
For as long as you live!
cuties!
Have a look :)
Reed Donovan stared at the flat-screen TV in the corner of the bar, and though his eyes were seeing the baseball game, his mind wasn't processing a single aspect of it.
This looks like a perfect setting for Savage Worlds or Triple Ace Games' upcoming Leagues of Adventure for the HEX system.
First: Danielle de Niese as Adina. I have listened to and not enjoyed her three recital discs - some of the singing is really very poor. But tonight it was almost like a different voice and I've never heard her sing so well. She started out rather tweety sounding, the vibrato very narrow and fast (nerves?), but she got better and better as the night went on, the sound relaxing and opening out, and by the second half she was on fire. In fact, as the music got harder she got better, and in the virtuosic final scene where she declares her love for Nemorino, she was easily better than anyone in the Rinaldo production I had seen the night before. I think she has improved a lot in the last year - I was seriously impressed and surprised. She's also a fantastic stage animal, moving so naturally, acting beautifully, vocally as well as physically, and of course she's absolutely gorgeous (even more so on stage than in real life I think). She really is close to being the ideal Adina, with the requisite sexual confidence, coquettishness and vulnerability to make the role really convincing and even interesting, and as she proved here, she's exactly right vocally too. I'm a total convert after being extremely skeptical. What a talent.
And last I got a mug that looks like a camera lens! I shall bow wear my bracelets and take my mug to every photo session. I now have super powers and am a force to be reckoned with!
Contact the companies at:
Sounds like a mandate for interpretation to me! It’s a brave new world out there – and according to my daughter, it should come in hot pink.
It’s also true that the government lacks women (only three out of 24), and that northerners are under-represented, in contrast to successive ATT cabinets in which northerners in general, and Tuareg in particular, were highly visible.
We were able to get our house into some sense of order (though the piano is STILL in the foyer) for Bryan's party on Saturday...but that didn't seem to stop anyone from having fun. We were outside most of the time anyway.
IMPORTANT NOTE: Sales for DOMESTIC destinations within
4:Any yankee in the starting lineup as they are facing Matusz who gives it up.
As a scholar I think these letters are a bit dangerous (as is any piece of evidence however small and seemingly innocuous in the Case of Philip K Dick); as they are the 'Selected Letters' I wonder who selected them (that's probably in an introduction I skipped), what was left out, and why. I have lots of questions, like why does Phil refer to Tessa in one letter as Leslie? Who exactly is 'Kathy'? And why in the world did PKD write that letter to the FBI about Disch's Camp Concentration?
3. What makes your mom sad? "messy houses"
4. Using a heat tool, heat and set the powder creating the faux leather look.
In follow-up studies, dual users of cigarettes and ST are less likely than exclusive smokers to achieve complete tobacco abstinence; however, they are also less likely to be smoking. The health risks from dual use are probably lower than those from exclusive smoking.
This Wednesday, In The Land of Between makes its world premier. Parents are coming. Video cameras will be out. Cookies are made. The kindergarten classes will stream into the school atrium and settle in.
Caress of cool mountain water
And from all this may actually emerge a strengthened, politically tighter Europe, which in the end is in everyone’s interest.
He was the first artist to be launched by Enigma Musik for 2002 and it seems his music was made for the masses. With astonishing airplay rotation on UK radio over the course of December 2001 and January 2002, Kam Dhillon was one of the biggest surprises for the UK Bhangra scene.
no-strings bailout
valiha) and synth-like keyboard textures, "The Red Shoes"
Brrrrrr....it was a very cold holiday, but one of the best and we had the most fabulous time....we got back in the very early hours of Christmas Eve....and yes, we are quite mad.
Two things happened yesterday that suggest to me that the Australian economy could be headed for recession. The first was the collapse of the First Fleet trucking company and the second was the release of the Australian Industry Group’s Performance of Service Index (PSI) which slumped 7.4 points. Houses and Holes covered it well in his piece here yesterday which he title “Something just snapped in the economy”.
While it's been a while since I did an organizational post it doesn't mean it's been that long since I was organizing! Honestly, I feel like I do it every day - there's always clutter somewhere that could be tackled.
There is one mystery kid, though. Kirby has complained that except during D&D games, he seems to have nothing to say. He was here this weekend. He's sixteen and he does go to school. I'll call him Joe (because that's not his name). He was up waiting for several other houseguests or my boys to wake up. I offered him cereal if he didn't want to wait for waffles; he fixed some. He wandered downstairs. Holly was in the den, where maybe 100 bought videos are visible, and two gaming systems. We have a dog and a yard. We have books, games, and toys. He told Holly "This house is really boring in the morning."
Guess who is Celeb’ Magazine’s Reader’s Choice Hot Teen Actor of the Month? Thx fans! U rock!
Finally add the saffron strands along with milk.
I mentally prepared myself for a long day with agonizing hunger pains, but thankfully it’s been a busy day with nothing more than a satisfied stomach.
So, here's my resolutions:
The wind blew down the sides of the moor, and something stirred in the ditch. It heaved itself out and along, and began to whimper like a baby, like a child.
The nose on this has sweet corn and oak. The palate is a bit flat with soapy notes, and it's hot for its abv. Some caramel and candy notes in the background. Finish is sweet and a bit buttery.
My food was pretty decent all week – I stayed within my 1400 calorie range all week, but I wasn’t really inspired by what I was eating. Lots of leftovers, fewer fresh veggies. It was the week before I get paid (I only get paid once a month), which is usually the week that I open the freezer and pantry and have whatever I can find that looks healthy. I don’t have any junk food in the house, but this week wasn’t my best ever, to say the least.
comes down to integrity -- theirs as individuals and ours as an
I’ve been fiddling with Google+ for a few months now, and I must say, I quite like it. Posting updates is easy and intuitive, the circles are great for sharing info with certain groups of people, and the clean-cut look is surprisingly refreshing.
As she takes care of the tedious house chores that hardly seem to stay completed for longer than ten minutes, help her to remember that all labor done in your name is not wasted (1 Cor. 15:58).
So, it's been just recently that I've been able to get out and about with my camera. But now that the warm weather seems to really be on its way, and the world is starting to turn green again (we already need to mow our yard!), it's time for more Photography Friday! And hopefully this year I'll remember to bank a few good pictures to use next winter.
The first thing any article about deja vu will tell you is that don’t worry it’s totally normal. Thanks guys! It’s good to know you’re not officially calling me crazy, but I don’t think anyone in history has experienced deja vu and immediately checked themselves into a mental hospital or anything. It’s pretty well known, guys. In fact, the earliest mentions of deja vu seem to be from St Augustine, talking about “Falsae memoriae” conveniently choosing to write in the type of Latin that is basically silly English for ease of comprehension. But the actual term deja vu wasn’t coined until almost 1900, by a man named FL Arnaud. Apparently he didn’t like the fact that it was being referred to as “false memory” because maybe that wasn’t what was occurring.
I'm so stoked!
